TRANSCRIPT OF VIDEOTAPE FILE:
______________________________________________________________________________
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE A1
F: I think everyone knows me. Here I prefer (NAME). Sometimes I struggle to hear. I want you to know that. I wear hearing aids. They help a lot. I have no idea what may transpire here the next few days. And I don't intend to control that. I want you to know I'm here. And will be as present to you as possible. To me that means listening to what's going on with you and also with myself. We have some recording equipment here that might seem a little distracting. My expectation for me is that I will get used to it after a bit and won't worry about it. My expectation is that tonight we're going to stay here until we get tired of staying here, and then we're going to do whatever else we decide to do. And probably we'll get together tomorrow. I think that's all I want to say for now. I certainly will have a lot more to say as time goes on. But that's all I want to say for now.
M: Hi, (NAME).
M: Nice to meet you.
M: Nice to meet you, too.
M: My name tag fell off. My name's (NAME), for anyone who can remember it. The three of us go to (name of college) with (name of facilitator) here. I'm gonna wait for someone else to say something.
R: I understand that, talking with (NAME) here, it's one of the fIrst workshops--he's been to one or two others. It's a new experience. I would like to say for me it's a new experience in a very different way. It's the fIrst time I have been present in a workshop group like this in which my vision is very defInitely limited. And so I can't depend on my eyes much to identify people. And therefore I have to depend even more on my ears. I promise that I will be as present as much as I can, even if! can't see your face and can't recognize you out in the hall when I see you next time. Please don't think I'm ignoring you. And if, when you're talking instead of looking straight at you when I can't see you at all, I may look sideways. My peripheral vision is quite functional. And I will feel very good if you will help me if sometimes I don't recognize you or if I ask for your name if you are willing to identify yourself again. And I join (NAME) in saying that because of this, and maybe because my hearing is not as acute as it has been sometimes, it is very important that I do hear what you say, if possible. And I shall do my best. I am really looking forward to being with all of you this weekend. And as I said, it's an adventure for me. And I think it will be a good adventure. And I hope it will be a good adventure for everyone who is here. It doesn't matter how different each of us is in experiences this weekend. And I also feel that if we're going to follow out the hope here which (NAME) has that it will also be important for the record which we are making to speak as clearly as possible, even if it's difficult sometimes if you're feeling deeply about something. So here I am with you. And I'm looking forward to being with you until Sunday afternoon.
M: My name's (NAME), and I didn't expect In a group where I don't know many people it's difficult to. I'm nervous right now.
F: I'm not hearing you.
M: I'm hoping that I can grow from this experience.
M: My name's (NAME). This will be the ftrst retreat that I've been on of this type. And I'm somewhat nervous about it. I hear it can be very intense, but I'm looking at it as a good experience for myself. And in order to work better with other people, work better in my relationships, both personal and professional. I'm aln (name of college) graduate, that's how I came to know (NAME). And I'm looking forward to the rest of the weekend.
M: I'm (NAME), and I'm a graduate student at (name of college), and I'm petrifted, and I've been dreaming about this workshop every single night. I'm just glad that I'm here now, and I can hopefully do a lot of growing this weekend.
M: Am I wrong to think that everyone here's affiliated with (name of college) in one way or another? Or ... (someone says something, everyone laughs)
F: My name's (NAME), and I'm not afftliated with (name of college). I've been there a number of times, but, umm, I don't think, feel I need to say a lot right now except that I'm really glad I'm here with all of you. I'm glad for myself that I'm here. I've done a number of these kinds of things, and I still feel a little terrifted. It always feels like a new adventure to me...it's real important. And this time I think what I'd like for myself is to be more open than in the past to allowing whatever to occur. Sometimes I set a lot of goals for myself. And this time I just want to go, flow.
M: My name's (NAME), and I graduated from (name of college) last (month). I'm here tonight because of my roommates.
They told me about this weekend, and I had (NAME) for a class when I was a freshman. And I liked him as a teacher and I thought this would be a good experience. Also right now I'm here too because I just got out of school and I'm having a hard time fmding a job and I thought this would be a good experience. I guess what I'd like to do is get to know myself a little bit better. Where I'm going. That's really it.
M: I'm (NAME). I'm just returning to school after working for seven years and for a lot of the same reasons that's why I decided to come here. To fmd out where I'm going. What's going on with me. I'm not really certain if I'm supposed to be doing this equipment or participating in the workshop. I'm not sure. I'm just watching I hope these guys can take care of themselves. They seem pretty capable. Just let everyone go. (laughter)
F: I keep thinking that that camera's not on. And I'm wondering if the sound is turned on. There's a switch on off on the microphone line and I don't know if I told anyone about those switches. And I don't see one red light on the camera, and so I think that it's not on. But maybe it is.
M: Isn't it true that you're taping it also? That you're audiotaping it? So you could always dub it in. It's nothing to worry about. (laughter)
M: It's working. I tested it.
M: We can always come back next weekend ... (laughter)
C: I needed to say that. I don't think I needed to talk about the equipment anymore.
M: Well, my name is (NAME), and I'm a graduate student at (name of college) and I went there with these guys. I'm not really sure why I'm here. I thought it sounded interesting, and we were talking about it on our way up and there were all these reasons. And I told them I guess I'll just fmd out when I get there. So I guess I'm just kinda open to anything -hopefully fmding out a little bit more about myself.
My name's (NAME), and I'm a graduate student at (name of college) also, and I'm glad that I'm here. I'm also kind of nervous. And I really didn't set any kind of goals. I'm just kinda going with the flow. And I hope this'll be a really nice experience and I'll learn something about myself. And about everyone here
M: My name's (NAME), and I'm also a graduate of (name of college) last year. And I was here over this weekend a year-and~ahalf ago, and when (NAME) sent the application there was a note across the top of it saying, "(NAME), do you dare again? (NAME)" And I looked at it, and I put it down. And this little funny feeling in the pit of my stomach said, "Look at it a little more closely and go for it." So that's why I'm here. And I'm scared. I'm in a different place in my life than I was then. And there are a lot more possibilities for me this weekend, and that's scary.
M: My name's (NAME), and I fIrst got interested in this kind of weekend when I took a class at (name of college) in humanistic psychology, and (NAME), who was a professor, offered an encounter weekend and I couldn't go because of my schedule. And I was disappointed because I wanted to. So when I heard about this, because I never had (NAME) as a professor, and I was interested. That's why I'm here. I was curious.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE A2
M: You know, we had ... I've got a response to that. You know, because my father died, well, a lot of other people have died in life, too, but I guess, because of everyone that's dying, more than others I think of what if someone I cared about died tomorrow, how bad it would be. It really begins to make you think, you know, how valuable life is. You know, you go to a funeral and everyone makes you think about it then, but everybody seems to lose it once in a while, you know. And I think I think about it more, and sometimes we focus too much on the bad things more than the good. Like when my father died, I thought, you know, I hated him. And it's only been, I guess I could say even now it's like I like him more and more. You know what I'm saying? It's like before I focused on the bad and now it's like the good starts coming out after a while. You know? All the good things, I should say, rather than the bad things that I focused on.
M: So, what I hear you saying is that when your father first died you thought about all the bad things about him? And as time went on ...
M: Not necessarily. He committed suicide. You see? And that adds onto the suspense of the novel here. Because he did that as a I blamed him for it. Why did you do it, and umm . "At eleven years old, I said, "Oh, wow, why did he do it?" I blamed it on me. It bothered me. But I came to accept that it wasn't. You know, he had his problems and he took care of it his way, and that was his life, even though it affected mine. But before, you know, I used to think, oh wow, he wasn't very expressive. But now that I can look back, I can listen to audiotapes, watch old home movies, and think, oh wow, he really did love me. And stuff, you know. That I didn't realize before. 


M: I know how painful it. Because I've had someone in my life, a seventeen-year-old, my friend's son, committed suicide. And it was so painful. And there's a lot of anger that's involved. Anger on that person's part as well as on my own. You know, I still have a lot of anger towards (NAME). It's like, how could you do this to me?" To everyone that's involved. It's a painful experience.
M: I think it's helped me look at other things, too, a lot more objectively. Because they obviously have a lot of difficult feelings, too. But the message I want to say is that, even though it might make you feel bad now, if you can possibly think about not only the bad things, but also some of the good things it might make it a little more for you, and that feeling itself might make you feel a lot different towards the person.
F: Are you okay?
M: Mmm hmm ...
F: The message I hear you say, (NAME) is that you've been through the blackness.
M: Yeah ...
F: And you've locked your father up and that with time you're opening your heart up to your father again.


M: Yeah, sure.
F: The message of hope that I hear, that you want other people to hear, is that no matter how black it can seem, you can get through the blackness.
M: Yeah ... it'll take a long time, though, for some people.
F: It took a long time for you.
M: It's still taking a long time for me. But it'll happen.
F: Mmm hmm ...
M: It happens day by day. It's not as if someday I'll wake up and, "Oh look!"
F: In your life it happens a little piece at a time.
M: Right. It's not so much a problem for me anymore. I vent it. And I'm sure other people have, too, and I always tell people, "Hey, it's a learning experience." about it, too. I
F: You said earlier, and I was confused when you said it, that in some way your father's death changed you or altered you in some way that you almost feel grateful for.
M: Well, you see, my father was like, something was wrong with him. I don't know what to this day. I mean, I think you could classify it a manic-depressive, I'm not sure, but something along the lines of mental illness. Maybe that was operating on him, you know. He was pretty much a perfectionist. And if! had it to blame on anything, I'd blame it on that. Nothing can be perfect in this world, but he tried so damned hard. He actually started changing me. He took me under his wing, and my mother often said he loved me more than my mother. Whether or not that's true, I don't know, but I do know that if! look back on myself then, and the way I am now I have been two totally different people. Before, when my father died, I would be yelling at my sister to pick up the lint off the floor. You know? My father did that. He would make the family do that. But now it's like, I don't know. I don't do that anymore. I've changed. I've grown. I don't know if he tried to make me the person he wanted me to be, but I was becoming someone that wasn't me. At least it wasn't the me. It's a very confusing topic. I mean, you guys understand where I'm coming from, don't you?
F: I think I can make sense of it. It's that you felt you were on a course ...
M: I didn't know it, in retrospect ...
F: You father's death sort of freed you ...
M: Yes, he was very demanding, he was very demanding on things. It made me very shy. I was very shy. I did my homework. I did whatever my mother said. I never had friends. So when my father died, fortunately I switched schools at that time, and you know, I sort of became, I said, I realized that there was a change. That I could do things my father wouldn't let me do previously. You know what I'm saying. It's very difficult to explain. I wish I could say some excellent metaphors!
F: You had some freedom you didn't have ...
M: Yeah, but, I was also growing up and becoming a teenager. That had something to do with it. All in all I started becoming the person I wanted to be. You know, I didn't feel any threat to that. And I became the person I am now! And I like me. Not to say that anyone else needs to! (sort oflaughs) I'm sort of curious about what others think of me. Not that it matters. It's sort of interesting.
F: I think that it does matter.
M: To me?
F: Uh huh.
M: It could, but it matters to me to the point where if you told me you thought the way I dressed was horrible, I'd blow you off. You know what I'm saying? I'd like people to like me, if that what's you mean. I think everyone does. But I mean, you know, I don't know if that's the same topic or a different topic that I started with. But I like the person I am now. My father's death just sort of contributed to that. I don't think I would be the same person if he were still alive.
F: You said the person you've become now is kind of your
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B2
M: ... how I screwed something up and they're like dumbfounded, like "You didn't tell us?" But that's the way they deal with it, I mean ...
F: To separate yourself from them you can't share ...
M: I feel like if I have a problem and I take it to Mom and Dad they make it their own problem.
M: They take some ofyour pain and your hurt and they want to fix you, put it bandaid on it, take it away from you.
M: You have one of these projects and Mom and Dad come over and they do this and that and before you know it it's their project. You know? They try to fix everything. Can't a kid grow up?
M: I hear what you're saying, (NAME). I think like my parents think that that's their role, that's what they're for. I mean, they have to fix my mistakes or prevent me from making mistakes. That's what they're supposed to do. And when I get so angry and try to tell them no, I mean, I think they get so confused they don't know, you know, what to do anymore. It's really hard.
M: They don't want to take on dilferent roles. They want to keep that same role.
M: I think as a parent of two boys at this point, I hear what you're saying, and how painful it is, I find it very hard to let go and how painful it is to watch my children make their mistakes and to see them routinely make mistakes and struggling, It's very difficult to allow them to make mistakes and not pick up pieces. And it's a real hard struggle. And I think it'sonly because my energy into my own life with my own feelings, with my own tasks or whatever that it's much freer for me, but hell, it's taken a lot ofyears. A lot ofyears. because ofit . a lot of resentment because ofthe control I have. And it's taken a long time to get over that. It's painful, and again, I'm speaking as a parent, it's very painful to watch that. Because you don't want to fix it, and yet it's not going to get you a damn thing. It still hurts.
M: It's hurts to just watch them screw up. And feel powerless to do anything about that.
M: And let them sit with their anger and say, "Fuck you. You don't own me. You're my mother." 


M: ... my mother! 


M: That's a hard place to be, too, and yet, that's what I meant, you have to be able to let yourself that's what I meant. You have to deal with it yourself. And it hurts 


M: So on one hand, ifas a parent you act protecting or ifyou really try to help them avoid mistakes, they think you're controlling them. On the other hand, it's painful as hell to watch someone bang their head, time after time. 


M: That's a grey area about parenting. Letting them experience that pain. Very seldom, but it has happened, that my daughter will send me a birthday card or an anniversary card and it will say just that, "You let me make my mistakes, you've let me follow my pain, and you haven't picked me up, and you still love me and respect me as a human being." And I guess as I'm sitting here I'm thinking, "Maybe I didn't do such a bad job." 'Cause I really thought I did a hell of a job. I blamed all their mistakes on me! And I've had to step back and say, I did the best I could with what I had. And I couldn't do it any differently ifI'd known better. And they need to heal from that. I can't heal for them. And for me, I have to do the same thing with my mother. I've had to heal from all the shit. But I can choose. I'm choosing to do that for myself. 


M: I'm hearing that that took a lot of courage.
M: To do what?
M: To let go of it.
M: Oh yeah. Yes. And my hope is that she will be able get rid ofthe baggage. And understand and accept me for who I am, right now, and love me for that. And I have to risk losing her if that's what she chooses. But I can't do anything about that. And yeah, I've let go. And it hurts.
F: I think that the lie the world taught me when I was young, when I was a child, was that when I grow up, when I get 21 or something, things will be different and I will know. I'll be an adult, things will be different. And I'll be responsible, and I'll work everyday, and I won't want to fuck off. And I'll know how to take care ofkids, I'll know how to raise kids. And that was a big lie. Because it never happened. And I'm 63 and it still doesn't happen. I'm still fourteen at heart and I'm still a kid. And I don't know how I'm supposed to act I don't act like my 63-year-old friends. And my kids are grown up, and they're making it and I don't know how I should have done it. When I was doing it I didn't know how to do it. And I'm really pissed off about that lie. I wasn't prepared for my ignorance. And I want to preach and teach a little bit at this moment. And to tell you if that's what you're thinking, And tell you rbelieve it's a lie, that you won't find that great golden spot, it isn't going to happen. It just doesn't happen. For me. It didn't happen for me.
M: So what do you do?
F: The best you can. 
F: I just keep on hoping that, . . . trusting. I guess one of the things I need to learn is that I just need to trust my unsuredness. Trust that I'm not going to hurt my kids. That they may feel some pain, but that in the long run I'm not going to hurt them. And hope that they will survive somehow. Hope that there's something, maybe a power bigger than me that controls things that knows more than I do, but I just don't know. And at the same time, I feel very, very loved by my two sons. I guess that that's all I have to say about that. 
I also, I'm feeling tired. Physically. I've been thinking for the last 20 minutes that I might want to pretty soon stop and get some rest. (NAME), would you take that away, I'm not through. You're a good person, thanks.
M: You and your judgements, (NAME).
F: That was control!
F: I would like to respond to that question, "How does it feel to be a parent?" I think the hardest thing I ever had to learn was that being protective of my family was really being possessive, and feeling that I somehow I owned them and had to take care of And when I reached a real crisis in my life it was real hell. I wanted to be hit by lightning so that I'd be out of it, when I realized that. And fortunately, I had a very dear friend to whom I could write and say, "I'm in such a mess here that I wish someone could come here and get ahold ofthis end of this tight skein ofyam so I can make some sense ofit. But I can't get ahold of this end. She came and stayed a week with me. And she showed me that other members had their own strengths if I would let them use those strengths and develop them. And that was the hell part of it. And I saw what I was doing to my family. By trying to be a good wife, a good mother, a good for everybody. And I feel that was a place in my life that made the real difference not only for me but for the life of everyone in my family. My husband could be an invalid, my daughter could be dependent. Which she is not. And that is the real joy of it. The real joy is that that brought me through that horrible valley ofpain and hurt and feeling that I wasn't worthy to live if I'd been doing that to people I loved, and came out on the other side, then I felt that I began to enjoy and appreciate and be not only a member of the family, a mother, or a wife, or whatever, but also a human being, who could love and appreciate the other members of my family. And right now I couldn't ask for a better friend than I have in my daughter. But I would like to say for me, it was going through hell to get here. And I appreciate so much, what several ofyou have said about parents trying to fix it and that probably, I didn't hear anyone say this, but I'm wondering ifyou might have meant to not only to fix it yourself but to screw up and still say it's okay. And I guess that's the ultimate place where I feel I have been able to reach with my daughter. That it seems that as she was growing up at the time ifI could hear that and listen to it, and be with her, that she would come out okay. And she is far more than I woud have ever dreamed. So that, in a very brief nutshell is what it is like for me to be a parent. And there were a lot of in betweens along the way. But I had to come to that critical point where I knew that something was wrong and had to be done about it, or I would have gone right on fixing it, eternally fixing it, trying to make it right. It's a real struggle to let go. And worst of all to realize that I'd been reallly choking the life out ofpeople I love when I thought I was helping them. So that's my personal answer to your question.
M: Thanks, (NAME).
F: And without that my life would've been much poorer. I can't qnite imagine what it would've been. That happened many, many years ago and I still feel very emotional about it. Because I think it was a real critical point in the life ofthe whole family.
M: It sounds like it was a hard place to be in a relationship
F: It was really hell. It was really that. And it made all the difference. I feel that after that my relationship with my husband and my daughter was more than I ever could have dreamed. But I had to learn first to let go and trust that they had it within themselves to become whatever they were to become. I guess it was a hell of a spot. And I can say thank God I got there when my daughter was still quite young many, many years ago. So we've had many years to grow together with me letting them grow instead oftrying to fix it my way. Because I think it was a critical point for the whole family
M: Can I ask you how young they were when you finally ...
F: Well, my daughter was five years old and that was many years ago, because she's 44 now. And she's taken many turns in her life that I wouldn't have chosen, but they're right for her. And I wouldn't want to change her.
F: Are you looking hole at the end ofyour tunnel, (NAME)? Are you looking for a hole in your tunnel?
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B3
F: ...about being at peace with it. Not in every case, but there's kind of this being at peace with it, but in many of these cases, at that point people have had some miraculous recoveries, and he's also saying that for many of these people, even though they were dying, and they did die, they felt they were healed in their spirit. It's a beautiful little book, and I'd be glad to let you look at it if you want. It really feels very consistent with a lot of my beliefs around healing in my own life, and somehow being at peace with what is, and not needing things to be changed, but just to dwell with what is. And these people are doing this in a way far beyond anything I've needed to do. It's quite an inspiration. I'd be glad to let you look at it.
M: Thank you.
(Background noise.)
M: It's noisy during the day here.
F: There's going to be a wedding here this weekend.
M: Ohhh ...
F: Apparently a disabled, person who had been a camper here is getting married, and I think they're going to have it tomorrow.
(Long pause ...)
M: Good morning ... 
M: Good morning! 
M: It's about time you got up! 
(Several people enter. Small talk...) 
F: We've got ping pong paddles here?
(Small talk ... shifting around, closing windows, curtains.) 
Now we can't get distracted without the windows open. So I sat on this side. Sorry, but ... (gentle laughter ... small talk ... quiet)
M: I have a need which I have to put out, or I'm not going to be very much present this morning, I'm afraid. Because I worked very hard last night, to be fully present and to be with people as they spoke, as they got into their feelings. And I think I missed about 50% of the conversation, so that I felt completely isolated, and powerless to make any contact. I knew it was going to be an adventure, but l did not realize that I was going to have that much difficulty in hearing people, particularly across the room from me. And I don't know what you can do about meeting that need of mine, but I needed to put it out so that you would know what that need is. It would be very helpful to me if it were possible for you to keep in mind that maybe I'm not the only one, maybe I am, but it would be a great help for me to be a part of this group if you can speak distinctly and for the most part keep your voice from going down into a low register. So having said that, I feel that I've done my part in communicating that need to you. And I've learned that an intimate relationship that ifI don't express my needs, I can't expect anyone to meet them. And I learned that about the fIrst ten years of my marriage. Sometimes I'm a slow learner.
F: Sometimes I'm a slow leamer, too, (NAME), because I know about speaking up, and I still fumble. So my commitment is to increase my awareness of clear speech.
M: I think you just put your fmger on it, (NAME). It's not so much the loudness as it is the clarity . . .
F: Yes ...
M: ... and letting the sound come out ...
F: Yes ...
M: ... rather than down or ... whatever.
F: Yes, and sometimes when I get kind of introspective, and cover my mouth with my hand, that kind of blocks the crispiness of the sound, and it's the crispiness that I need here, and I suspect that you do, too. Not-necessarily the loudness. '
M: I heard ...
F: This morning when I came in, (NAME), I did what I could to shrink our circle, too. I didn't know if that would help, but I was sort of thinking that if the sound didn't have so far to travel, that might help all of us hear better, too.
M: Thank you. So far it's felt much better.
M: Did (NAME) take off?
M: Yeh, he had to go to take a test. 
F: He wanted to leave by 10:30. He may not be gone yet.
M: Is he coming back?
F: He's coming back. He has to take a test at 12:30.
M: Gee ...
M: I heard-what, you said, too, (NAME). I heard what you said about your needs. And, uh, I think, uh, in some ways you might have felt disregarded that you presented your needs last night and they still in some ways weren't met, and that you still weren't able to hear all the conversation last night. And I think that sometimes for me it's easy to forget what someone's needs are, when it's not one of my own needs. And I'm owning that myself today, and my hope is that we as a group will be able to make a better effort.
M: Mmm hmm ... 


M: I know I don't like to repeat myself when I talk. I don't like to repeat myself. 
M: And I know it's difficult to think about the way I'm speaking, when I'm speaking about a very deep feeling. And I appreciate that very much, too.
F: I would like to make the circle even smaller. I see four chairs that could be removed, and if we need more space later, we can expand the circle. I think this whole side could be removed.
M Good idea (NAME).
(Talking, moving chairs, climbing over, laughing.)
F: Oh, this feels very good! You know, one of the workshops on ________  ________ , one of the fIrst ones that we had on the _coast, we were inquiring about the size of the room and the number of participants -it was at College on ________ -they said, the room accommodates about 50 people. And we said, "We're expecting about a hundred." They said that would never do. But we went down and inspected the room, and it was nice. It had comfortable sofas and chairs around the edge. And we said, "We'll take this for our meeting room." And they felt we were crazy. They said, "It's impossible for 100 people to be in this room if you're going to have these long sessions." But, do you know, it was the best thing that ever happened for that workshop. We got to be closer together. And we learned to be very comfortable, very cozy in that room. I think it was partly, (NAME), you were there, weren't you?
F: Yeh. We even sometimes touched each other. (Laughter).
F: Anyway, we had togetherness. (Some laughter ... ) 
M: (NAME), what are you giggling about?
M: I'm just laughing at you, (NAME)!  (Laughter .. ) I'll be honest!
M: (NAME), I still feel a sadness from this morning when you did, indeed, touch me, and made a remark about how solid I felt. And the sadness is that I couldn't feel , because I'm numb. I'm realizing as you're saying that, that it was very special. I knew that, but at the same time but couldn't feel that (speaking too low to hear) ... being numb and blocked.
F: You mean you were feeling that as I touched you, and you weren't able to feel that very much, you weren't able to feel that at all?
M: Both.
F: Both. One stops the other.
M: It's very diificult for me. It takes a lot for my senses to come alive, my sense-of touch especially. And oftentimes it's when I become very emotional that I fmd sensation in my fingertips and know that I'm not just feeling pressure from the touch.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B4
M: I've gotten some reaction. Not always what I expected, but, I can't see it, you know, and maybe I have done more than I thought, I just don't know. Maybe the impact of those modest attempts was more than I thought.
F: It feels risky for me to say this, but I'm going to take a risk. If there's any way that you, any need you would feel from me, I would like to invite you to express that to me. But I feel very, very open and energized to listen to hear what needs you might have from me in the context of this community.
M: Thank you.
F: And I would just like to express that to you.
M: I'm not even sure what they would be right now ...
F: I know.
M: But thank you.
F: Thank you. 
F: What's that about? 
F: (Chuckles ... ) I guess I was feeling like there's lots of intellectual talk here. We're talking intellectually, and I was feeling like I wanted to do something different. And I started to do something different. And so did you. 
F: Your different thing was when you commented on people who are not speaking? That was I saw you do that was ... 
F: That was my fIrst move. My second move was to relate the caretaker role that (NAME) articulated very clearly in my experience with (NAME). And my experience was that it was coincidental maybe that I selected a person that I didn't know was a caretaker can be a caretaker. That brought it closer to me.
F: The feeling for you was, you were drifting away, you were separating from the community, is that ... 


F: Yeah, I kept drifting away ...
F: And wanting to be reengaged somehow ...
F: Right. And one way I reengaged myself was to silently do it and to be with (NAME) here for a moment. And he didn't even necessarily know it. And to be with the rest of you who were silent. Because I was with those of you who were verbal and I wanted to be with everybody, and I wasn't. But then I was. I did it, with or withoutcha, I did it anyway. And that was my activating myself to be present. And then I saw you reach (NAME), saying, in the present moment, whenever that might be, I ... let's you and I have experiences. I offer myself to you. Ask for your needs . . .
F: To be received. Yeh.
F: And I thought that whole process was probably very evident in your mind, and so then when I said thank you, it was not exactly what I meant.
F: I guess I was kind of manipulating a little bit, because I think I did know! (Everyone laughs:) But I didn't want you to get away with just saying "thank you."
F: I think what was happening to me was, I was feeling very, very respectful of the conversation, but I was observing myself leaving. I was here sitting, but my mind was wandering ... 'how long is it till lunch?' and I wasn't present as I was hearing the conversation, primarily between (NAME) and (NAME). But it's a fundamental value of mine that I believe that what's happening in the group at any moment represents legitimate, valid needs, and I pass no judgment on those ... you term it 'intellectual' and I don't know if that's judgmental for you. But for me, I just felt no sense of judgment, and I often experience myself as, as attaching immense importance, tremendous value, to varied intellectual conversation. E and I went at it yesterday, uh, at a very abstract level, for a long, long time, and that's rich for me. And even though I wasn't totally present, I felt peaceful in wanting to allow it to continue. And I'm not sure what shifted me that I decided to respond to you. I think a part of me was still touched by your earlier conversation about the uncertainty in the sense of wanting some movement, but not really being sure how that would manifest itself. Umm... And I think I started to speak because I wanted to reconnect with you at that level. I don't believe I wanted to, or was trying to manipulate the situation to interrupt or to derail that conversation. Umm... Because my sense was that it was very meaningful for other people in the room.
F: I would like to feel that all parts of me are welcome here.
F: Yes! 
F: And that if I have deep feelings, or deep needs, or I am very close to someone else's feelings, or if! have an idea or a reminiscence that I feel that I want to put out, I would like to feel free to do that.
F: Mmm hmm ...
F: And I don't have to be all that much engaged all the time with everyone. I can't be. But there's someone who will. In this group. And I've been experiencing that. There's someone, there's been someone who's responding to the reminiscence, or thoughts, or the immediate feelings. And that feels very good.
F: And all those are welcome for you.
F: All those are welcome. They will all be welcome. They are by me.
F: Even me when I, even me when I feel you're not welcome?
Is that welcome, too? Yes! I feel that.
F: Sometimes, sometimes people aren't quite ready to get down in their own deep pit, or deep well, and it takes some patience for them to get there. If that happens sometimes I think ... 
M: Isn't it where you are on your onion? ... and some of us are on the outside, and some of us are on the inside?
Itt\: (NAME)' s image of the onion. Some of us are very much on the outside, and just starting to peel, and others are much closer to the core, and it depends on where you are?
F: (NAME), can I talk? I feel very urgent and I want to respond to you. I say very emphatically yes, that your feelings of being impatient at the process are welcome to me. I may not share them, but if that's your truth, your current experience at the moment, I value that. It may have implications. It may stir up a lot of feelings in other people. Or if I'm engaged in something that's I feel is very important to me, and you don't value it, I may be hurt, I may be angry, but if that's genuinely your experience of me or this community - that's of value to me. Because your feeling is you're not with me, if that's what you're experiencing that piece of you won't be accepted, won't be heard. And I want to hear that.
F: You want to hear me even when I'm leaving you, that I'm leaving, that I've left ...
F: Yes, yes ... 
F: And also, I would hope that you would be open to hearing me, whatever that might stir in response.
F: Absolutely.
F: My wish for myself is to exclude nothing.
F: The paradox in that is that as I hear your reaction to my having left you is that I can no longer affect you. If I'm hearing you.
F: Yes. There's something that I wish to be clear about in stating my values, which is that ... and this feels subtle, but very, very central to who I am, I'm often around counselors or other people who believe that in a group situation there is some goal, that there is some form ofbehavior or sharing that is of greater value than others. If people are sobbing and weeping, or raging in anger, or really in touch with their feelings, that that's what we're here for. And that if people are intellectualizing, that that's not quite as good. Or if people are silent that that's even worse. I would like to go on record as saying that the work that I want to do on myself is to be absolutely in the moment present with what is, without a sense that something needs to be different about what anybody else in this room is doing. I may have some reactions in responses to what's happening, but that's also part of the present moment in me. And I don't attach myself at this point in my life to choosing one kind of process or another in a group. And I would like for everyone in the room to know that. Whenever I'm interacting with someone, I don't have a plan in my mind that somebody needs to do something, or needs to go deeper, or to do this or to do that. My work for myself is to simply be with what is and follow it where it goes. Umm ...
F: That's a goal and a commitment which I hold for myself. Pretty much that. Knowing damn well that I'm not going to be able to do it all the time ...
F: Yeh, yeh ...
F: So that I have no illusions about my being 100% present all the time, even when I can hear everything. But that certainly is my attention and my commitment, 
insofar as it's humanly possibly. 
F: Mmm hmm ...
F: And (NAME), I would like to say to you that one of the things that I greatly respect in you is the fact that when you have a feeling, or an impulse, or whatever, that 
you are able and honest and able to say it in the group. And I greatly respect that. It's one of the things I especially like about you.
F: Hmm ... 
M: Me, too. I learned from you in class about that.
F: Yes, it's one of the things I respect about me, too, and I, urnm, some old stuff comes to me once in a while and that's not all right. I feel like it's not all right. It's not all right for some other people. And those other people become my parents, the church.
And, I'm a naughty boy.
F: That piece of you isn't prized. That spontaneous ...
F: That's right. I'm a bad boy. I did it again. That's the way it was coming out of the womb. And it's been that way ever since. The wettest thing I ever did was wet the bed when I slept with my mother when I was twelve. (Everyone laughs.) I used to wet the bed, and they all told me I was too lazy to get up, and so I would just lie there and wet. Can you imagine a bright child pissing in his bed because he was too lazy to go to the bathroom? That's what I was accused of all my life! Once that I remember I slept with my mother when we were on a trip. My message, was "Piss on you!" And I pissed on her, and I never wet the bed again. I don't know how that got relevant here, but ...
F: It was fun ...
F: It had to do with that old stuff that many of us have suffered with and...


M: I feel like I was at ameeting for  the last ten or fifteen minutes. I need to say t at.  I feel like I was  bserving a triangle. And maybe I was the only one ... 
F: You mean OUR staff meeting?
M: Yes, that's what I was experiencing the last few minutes. Between you and (NAME) and (NAME). And I think on one hand it was interesting for me, but I really feel like I was an observer. I think I was feeling resentful.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B5
M: ...I can feel the pain that's created by the fact that you couldn't fix your parents' marriage. What I heard you saying was that you felt it was your responsiblity, and I tired to do the same thing with my parents. And I can feel the pain you feel about it ending, because I didn't want - even though I knew it was best for my parents to end their marriage, and I would be better off, still it was incrediably painful to have that happen, and it was painful to hold that inside, that whole many years. And when I say many years, I'm talking about fifteen years. ...So I want to thank you for being so courageous to talk about that.
M: I can talk it now/so long that it came now (?) because there were so many, it's so long that I didn't. Like even when that happened, I didn't talk about it. It ended angered? I didn't really start dealing with it until I went to (college). ??? It is good. To start feeling better.
F: A long way back this afternoon, was it (NAME) over here? who was it? was speaking about if she could be articulate, (NAME)? and I felt someway that somehow you had more to say, and I want to know if you still have it.
M: ? No, I think it's just an ongoing stuff ttl have and it's times like that when I appreciate your awareness of putting the pieces together of my story, of my experience. Understanding is an important part of my experience...understanding what's happened, what is happened. And when I can have an awareness, I'll be affIrming, then that will be my own spirit, it really helps me. I'm just not at that point much. So you're asking something, I'm not sure what. I probably reacted as I normally would, doing it at the wrong time. And so your reaction unsettled me.
F: (NAME), that was one reason I said I was feeling tom. Because I knew this had a lot of meaning for you, and I very much wanted to be with you, and found that I couldn't at that moment.
M: And I understood that.
F: And I also understand your feelings that you might have done something wrong, or bad timing. It was a painful moment for me. I really wanted to respond to you in a way that communicated my desire to be with you, but my incapacity at that moment...


M: And you know I totally understood that ...
F: But you still had the feelings ...
M: And yet I couldn't identify them. It was like I just shut down, and ... made me realize ... how painful might have been with the group. Brings to mind the point made this morning, bringing me to where I'm at ...
F: I'm not hearing ...
M: ...that 'wherever we're at to be accepted there, and, umm, inappropriate as I might have thought I was, I'm hearing that it was okay. But that's okay. And that I'm okay.
F: Something felt very important for you to say, and it seems that it wasn't the right time. You felt, you felt hurt, and put aside, even though that was not the intention. It was hard to hear the intention at that time. Of hearing you, of why you got cut off. Am I hearing it right?
M: Yes, but it's real hard for me to know that's what's happening when it's happening. Because to survive when I'm in a situation like this, whatever it was, I would shut down. I would completely shut down. That's apparently what I did. So I may not, even though I was feeling the feelings, I wasn't acknowledging them. And you bringing it up, I'm connecting with them now. Umm ... and they're real alive. And it's exactly what I do feel like. And I know the intention wasn't bad, but the feelings are there. And they're temporary, and that's okay. And that I'm okay.
F: Something that felt very important for you to say, and it seemed that it wasn't the right time, and you felt hurt and put aside, even though that was not the intention at that time. It was hard to hear the intention at that time about the ... You felt cut off.
M: Mmm hmm ... You know, it's interesting that you say that, because I was struggling with appropriate, umm, I really worry about that. I don't know. I guess it is. Hmm.
F: (NAME), it felt like a risk for me to say that, umm, I was really very truthful about feeling unavailable at that moment. I think in times past it would have been very very easy for me to put aside my experience and to be with you, no matter what. No matter if . .And I would have shut down, And somehow I felt enough trust in our the connection we have that I could take that risk, and that if there were any painful feelings that came up as a result that we would work that out.
M: Mmm hmm . .. Again, at the moment, what you said was very appropriate. It did just pull the trigger on old shit for me, and I shutdown.
F: Yeah, I understand that.
M: But at this level ...
F: Are you okay?
M: wasn't in touch with feelings at all.
F: to stay shut down.
F: I would hope, (NAME), that another time, (NAME), you might be able to come back for yourself, and to bring it up again. It might be a release for you next time. It's a hard thing to do.
M: Right now I don't feel that it's important. I'm not there. I'm very present and very much in touch with the feelings that I had shut down. So I'm not at that point. You know, I'm choosing to stay right on it. Again, it's that sense of choosing to be in that space and to welcome it and to ... I'm alive -I'm alive! And it's nice.
F: The part that touches me deeply is, in retrospect, that you did as you did when you were a little girl, which was to go numb as you did. And the part that touches me is that now I hear you prizing all of you, saying, "It's okay! I don't need to stand in judgment of the fact that that happened to me. That I'm willing to send my acceptance into that shutting down. And, just to dwell with it." And that's ... if I'm hearing you correctly, that's a lot of self love, self prizing. Saying, "I'm okay, just as I am. Sometimes I shut down, sometimes I feel like I may say things out of tum, but it's okay. I'm okay." That's what I believe I hear ...
M: Yeh, and I think that when I'm shutting down, it was accepting to be okay. It's something that when it first happened it didn't feel okay.
F: Mmm hmm ...
M: When I was sitting here, leaving, but I didn't, I made that choice, to stay here. That was a conscious decision for me, I don't know because of all the stuff that was going on here, but that was a conscious choice I made, to sit here and stick it out. I don't know. I don't know how it would have resolved otherwise, but I know it was appropriate.
F: You didn't run away from it.
M: It was a temptation momentarily to do that, which would have been the old way of coping. I guess my hope is that I wouldn't have to shut down. There may come a time.
F: Maybe next time you'll say, "(NAME), if you can't be with me right now, there are 19 people in this room who could be perhaps, and I want to be heard. And other peoples' needs may have to wait.
M: Yes ...
F: Maybe you can't imagine yourself maybe ...
M: Yes, I guess I was trivializing with what I was saying, because if it had been something important, I might have ...
F: You might have stood in the middle of the room?
M: I would love to do that! Stamp my feet and scream and holler!
F: I'd like you to hear that, and I believe you did, that there was something very growthful about that in that interaction for me, too.
M: I can hear that.
F: To be honest with you and with everybody, that I didn't know which way to turn.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B6
M: I'd love that ... you're kinda lucky you do, or did, have friends, girl friends.
M: Thanks. It's tough now, though. Because we lived basically together now for four years, now we're a couple of hours apart, you know.
M It is. It's rough.
M: Phone bills. Headaches. Trying to get together all of us. It's worth it, too, ya know. I really miss it now. One thing that's nice is I have my own bathroom at home. (laughter) Shared with six girls last year. (laughter)
M One thing you don't realize how much you have until it's gone.
F: You don't realize what you have until it's gone?
M: Mmm hmm ...
F: It's important to hear. It's important to me about that, too.
M: Once in a while you get lucky enough to get them back again. Then it's like, wow! Great!
F: Then it's better than it ever was before?
M: Yeh ...
M: What did you say?
M: That ii's better than it ever was before.
M: I think a lot of times what we do comes out of deprivation. Last year I went to eastern Europe, the other guy was from eastern Europe. That's why I had a guy so I was in (country) for six months or so, seven months. And somebody came by with a copy of so I said I stayed up all night reading it. (laughter) 
F: I feel very moved by the friendship I see between everyone on this couch!
M: With pillows!
F: The people with pillows! I've been away from college for fifteen years or so. I've managed to stay in touch, in close touch, with two or three very close friends from those years. Some I've lost track of. But for me, the friends that I've kept from those years are such treasures to me now. And hearing you speak of the sorrow of moving away from that era of your lives, it fills me with some nostalgia for that period of my life, too.
M: My father always tells me change isn't easy. I have to, though. I should take another year of college, but I don't know. I have to move on eventually.
M: That's why you go to graduate school.
(Everyone laughs.)
M: Having been away a year-and-a-half from college, I did enjoy my college years, especially (name of school). I remember chuckling to myself of the times in graduate school when we would have a classmate marry, and we'd bring our sleeping bags. We'd go over to a friend's and spend the night in our sleeping bags. And we used to get looked at really funny. I mean walking around with sleeping bags and pillows and staying over in the dorms! We had a ball! We'd go to a party, and we knew we were going to be drinking and we didn't have to drive home. Stay in the dorms! We did it two or three times.
M: My buddies had a beer ball before I started college, and, uh, so when I started (college) part-time, I'd had enough of the partying to head for staying gassed, getting dirty every day of the week. So my motivation was very different for going to school. And I was never very studious when I was in high school, either, so ... Yeh, I was pretty uptight, and I guess on top of that, I've always had a tough time making friends. So the two of those things together would be ... I'd try to change it now. I guess it just comes with time. Confidence, change. I'll never forget graduation day 'cause I didn't know anyone. I knew,nobody really knew me.
F: What?
M: So that day was lonely
M: You accomplished something, but there was something missing.
M: Yeh, in some ways I repeated high school in the sense that I made friends but I just felt inadequate. And didn't feel that I had much to offer. That's why when I hear friendships, it's like wow. You had it. And you're still having it. I didn't have any. And I still don't have any. And you're younger than I.
F: And you?


M: Umm, I'm busy in other ways, but ... married, have a wife, a baby. That part of my life - when they say change - that part of my life is gone now, it'll never come back. And I don't know if I'll always be, or consider myself a loner. And I don't know what's happening and it's okay. I'm choosing to keep going at a pace I'm going, so I can't blame anybody. If I really wanted to change, I would. That's whyI like the comments before dinner that everybody has the opportunity to make themselves. Whatever that is. And that's how I've been thinking about me. I kinda grew up in a pretty dysfunctional alcoholic home. And my role was look after your own ass. So I kinda continued that. But I don't think I regret growing up in an alcoholic home, because I think it gave me, created something in me. I'm not sure what. But I'm a doer, not a talker. I'm talking now...I guess what I was originally thinking, when I was thinking of getting back I was thinking of my relationship with my father. When I grew up, it was, like nonexistent. I was afraid of him. And then when I became physically the size of him, I didn't worry about him anymore. I wasn't afraid of him, but I had nothing of a relationship with him. And then that changed. That changed when I, I don't know, when I started going to college. It really changed when I told my father that I wasn't going to AA meetings anymore. I wasn't going to AA. I was going to lead my life. Umm, and he said, I've lost him now. And pleasing dad, and dad's idea of church. But I'll never forget that day, when I said, "I'm not going anymore, Dad, I'm sorry." And they both went, "My God, what's he doing?" It was...but you know, I have to be me. I went off into a sidetrack here. I just never expected to preach(?)!
F: I was kind of smiling because you, what you call a sidetrack is a theme, a very prevalent theme before you came. You fit right in. We have lots of issues about fathers and parents. And uh...
M: (NAME), I want you to know that I miss being with you this summer. A lot. The friendship that we've built over the past two summers and parts of this one are really important to me, and you're part of it, and someone I'll never forget, it meant a lot. When we all said I'll help you through this training, I guess we didn't know what we were getting ourselves into, but it meant a lot. And I can understand how you feel, because I know we both come from the same background. And I can also understand how it feels when you talk about being older than everybody else and not being able to connect with people in college. Because I went through the same thing. I needed to hear that. It was so much different. It was real hard.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B7
M: . . . something happens to me, ummm, not necessarily a happiness emotion ... it could be sadness, it could be pain, it shakes me so deeply and resonates so deeply within me that I can do nothing eIsebut to feel that. Sometimes I can't be around people unless they're able to let me be in my pain, in my hurt, or my anger, and I want to be in no other place but experiencing that pain, experiencing that hurt or suffering or grieving or whatever I need to do. And I want to be there for as long as it takes to be there. And I don't know if that's making up for lost time. I don't know if I'm reliving some other experiences. I don't really care. The only thing I care about is experiencing that pain or that hurt or those emotions that are vibrating within me until the cords stay still. Ummm, and uh, what you were talking about finally affected me and it validated me, and, uh, I guess I'm saying it's okay for me when I'm in pain or I'm sitting in shit, and that's a long time, that that's what I need to do. Not stuff it away. I don't know why. It just feels good.
M: I want to thank everybody that I saw outside in the woods. I was walking around by myself, I felt like shit, and I wanted to, and then I turned the comer and just by chance, everybody was there. And everybody was nice, and everybody listened to me. And that was just what I needed right there. Thanks.
F: (NAME), there's a lot that I love about you, and one of those things is your determination to let what is rising in you come to its own natural conclusion without interference even from you. Because using the words, "Let it be." It might take a week, it might take a year, but you are not going to abandon your own experience now. 
It's home to you.
M: It's good that you understand that. I think about the time last year when I was having personal difficulties, and I went home on Friday afternoon and I said, I've got to get everything out of my life that's not supporting me in experiencing the pain. It was real scary for me. And I wasn't going to do anything until that, really. Sunk within 
me. It was a whole week that I was in my house with nothing. With the shades closed. It's kind of funny when I think about it now.
F: And you stopped the clocks. You put the clocks away.
M: Put the clocks away.
F: Unplugged the telephone. Pulled the shades down.
M: And I just sat there. Day and night.
F: You say you just sat there. What I think is that there was, there was a raging storm howling inside of you.
M: Yeah.
F: And you turned into the storm instead of trying to flee from it. And you let it take you, change your shape.
M: It feels good that I'm not afraid of those storms. And it feels good to know that my friends are not afraid of those storms.
F: And we're not going to come after you in a Coast Guard cutter.
M: Mmm hmm. That's lovely.
M: What's revelating for me, and when I hear that, for me, and it's an image that I'm a robot and at times when I can stay in the shit and I can thrive in it, I can grow in it, and say "This is a gift," I delight. I love it. And I'm wanting to go into the storm and choosing that and it just resonated in me, like "Yeah," when you feel it, it's "Just leave me alone. Let me feel it."
M: It's fertilizer.
F: Flowers grow in shit. (General laughter.)
M: Yes!
M: (NAME), I want to thank you, because before you said that I thought I was a little bit fucked up and crazy 'cause I've done that before. I don't have my own house. I go out in the woods and I just go camping until I feel like going back. You know, and I can't do it when I'm at school or something. When I get a break or something, I can't go, and I feel trapped, but when I get a break, and if I've got anything, my own storm to go through, I'll take off and just go camping for awhile. And I just thought I was a little nuts, but thanks. There's someone else out there doing the same thing! It feels good.
M: I hear you, (NAME).
M: I just wanted to say something to you too, (NAME), that really hit home with me because the last couple of weeks I was really depressed and I didn't want to get out of bed and I didn't want to put the shades up. And my mother was trying to rescue me, and everyday would come in and put the shades up and tell me to get out of bed and to go out that night ...
M: She wanted you to feel better ... 


M: Yes, and it would frustrate for me, and that's just the thing...I just wanted to feel bad.
M: Stand up and pull the shades back down, and pillow.
M: Yeh, in my own time I got up. One morning I got up and I put the shades back up. But it made it harder, and I think it prolonged it. Because every morning she would come in and put the shades up, and I would get up and I would argue with her and I would put them back down. And that was energy I didn't want to be wasting. It was just where I wanted to be. She made me, even though she was trying to help, she made me feel like I was wrong for feeling the way I did. Which made me feel even worse. You know, like on top of all this, I'm wrong. You know, but, thank you for saying that. You made me feel like I wasn't so wrong.
M: I hear what you're saying, and I know what it's like for me. I can't be around people who won't allow me to experience those feelings. It makes me angry. It makes me really angry when someone doesn't allow me to feel those feelings.
M: I want to thank you for sharing that, (NAME), because I had a situation this summer that I really felt bad about. My partner was just sitting in shit because of his feelings. And it was uncomfortable for me to be there. And I just had to walk away, and say "You need to, I can't fix this for you." And I felt really terrible about that. But now hearing your side of the story I understand maybe I did the right thing. For myself as well as him, too, to allow them to sit in their shit.
F: There are some people in (state) who run an institute. It's a couple. And years ago they had an autistic child and they took their child to all of the experts all over the country and expert after expert, psychiatrists, doctors, said, "There's no help for your boy." They put him in program after program, I don't know, put him on medicine, and spent thousands and thousands of dollars, and the boy just sank deeper and deeper. And this couple decided that they were going to take the biggest risk they ever took. And they were going to assume that their little boy was the expert on autism. And that if there was a way that they could be loving to him it was to love him unconditionally, to radically abandon their desires for him to be any different than he was. And to enter as fully as they could the world of a three-year-old autistic boy. And they devoted their life to their lives to this, for I believe, two years. And for every moment that this boy was awake, they sought to enter as fully as they could into his world. And if he would stand in the middle of the room and shake his head for an hour, they would stand in the middle of the room for an hour and shake their heads. And if this boy banged his head against the wall for an hour, they would stand with him and bang their heads. And if he sat in silence for three or four hours, they would sit there right with him in silence for three or four hours and do what they could to be with him in his autism, with love, without any desire to change him. And what happened was a miracle. The boy came out of his autism. And as I understand, he's now a teenager, and the book I looked at said he has an IQ of 140 and is a straight-A student, and has a girlfriend. Plays a . . . And I was so moved by that. ...And they now run an institute for autistic children where people from all over the world come with autistic children or family members who people feel are hopelessly lost, in one way or another. And to me it's exactly the story of allowing some wisdom in the body to take over. And it seems a wisdom that you embrace with deep trust. Just the way those people did with that little boy.
F: That bears out what Carl said about his work with schizophrenics. He was working with people who had been labeled as schizophrenic, I think Carl seldom put a label on anybody, but they found that volunteers who weren't. ..who volunteered to stay with a patient who had been diagnosed as schizophrenic, and simply be with that person each day that the results were more positive and more lasting than those who the medical staff, than those who the medical staff had treated. And I think of that often when people say, "I'm a volunteer," it could very well be that the volunteer is going to bring real hope and real life to some of the people they are volunteering with. And they have no reason to feel inferior to more highly trained . people who don't care that much. (Pause.) It seems strange that it's so hard to believe that caring and being with a person, and listening to a person can be enough.
M: And is also considered radical. (Soft laughter.)
F: I spent 22 months in a hospital and was diagnosed and prescribed treatments and constantly told what was wrong with me and how I should change to get better. When I went into the hospital, and for the first year none of that meant anything to me. And I knew that I would only find a place sooner or later to commit suicide. And all these people who glad-handed me and told me what wonderful therapy they had had and how cured they had gotten didn't mean anything to me because I was different. And I knew that. After about a year a young psychiatrist came who was doing residency, and he was weird. And he gave a lecture in the auditorium to all the nuts, including me, and he was asking questions, and I asked a question. I don't remember what the question was. He seemed to be touched. And he seemed to value that question. First of all he said, "That's an interesting question! And I'm not sure I can answer it. But let me try." And when I was on my way out of the auditorium, he tapped my shoulder and said, "Make an appointment to see me." And then, I made an appointment to see him. And I don't know ifhe'd ever heard of Carl Rogers" I know he has now, but I don't know if then in the mid-50's he had, but he listened to me. He respected me. And he wanted to know what all I was about. And, umm, as an aside, the director of the hospital had told my fiancee, who came to visit me and spoke with him about me, to give up all plans for marrying me, because I was too sick, and I would be manipulative, and I would do a lot of bad things. That was not this psychiatrist. Well this man, Dr. (NAME), helped me rediscover myself, or not even rediscover myself, but discover myself, and I got better quickly. And I was out in four months. And I married this woman, in spite of that bad advice, or that wonderful advice she got, 34 years ago, and I'm still married to her. And, umm, and umm, what? It had something to do with whatever I said. I got in touch with that story. You said something (NAME), about ... I don't know what you said. You said something about volunteers who don't diagnose ... they don't know how to diagnose, poor souls, they don't know how to prescribe, poor souls, they just be there, in their stupid ways. And listen. And people get better! And I got better when this man didn't do anything that doctors are supposed to do. And, by God, I know what I'm talking about. My colleagues don't even know about the story I've told you. People I work with. And in several universities where I work. I haven't told that story. And they come around telling me how to help people get better. And how to diagnose them, and how weird I am because I don't buy into that. I just laugh at them. Because I know better. I know how to get better. So do you, (NAME).
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B8
M: I was lucky enough to be smart enough that I could to go to class maybe one or two times a week and not have to go. I mean, obviously, my high school wasn't doing a lot for me. Wasn't meeting any of my needs, really. And I would just take my books and go sailing, sit on the island, read all day, and sail back, and be home when I was supposed to be home!
M: Wow. I was afraid to get caught if I didn't show up.
M: Yeah, (high school) is a little more high intensity. You had to be there.
M: Yeah, but I mean in high school, when I was in jr. high, I mean, it didn't even dawn on me to skip. I may have skipped a couple of times in two years.
Ma: I was the phantom of my class. That's what I was called. Because I'd appear and disappear. Which I don't know how good that was. You know, maybe if I would have stayed, I would have had the meals and stuff. That's how it was. But that's how I survived it.
?: You took a lot on by yourself! Your education.
M: Yes, it's funny that ...
(NAME)'s singing alarm goes off.)
How gentle is the rain. A moment from a Hyundai Sonata. Joy weather...celebrating the weather.
F: I just talked with (NAME), with (NAME), and with (NAME), and I told them that there were some important things I wanted to do in the group this morning, and I that was hoping they'd be there, but if they chose to go back to sleep I'd respect that, and it seems they were in the process of choosing to get up and get here. I think, I didn't fmd (NAME) in his bed, and you said somebody else was in the shower.
F: (NAME) went into the shower, (NAME) may have already gone into the shower 'cause the shower was running.
F: It was running. So I imagine (NAME) was in the shower.
F: I couldn't fmd ...
(NAME) is steered to another shower.
F:  The young women, (NAMES), they may be off on a walk somewhere. I don't think they're in the building. Has anyone seen them?
M: They were at breakfast, but I think that's the last time anyone's seen them.
F: I'm ambivalent about, or I'm in conflict about how I wish that they had mentioned that they were going for a walk and might be late or not come at all. And respected their choice and not inform anybody. Those are two things I value. And I think I'm feeling and behaving differently this morning because I have some stuff I want to do, than I was yesterday morning when it might not have mattered so much.
M: I hear what you're saying, (NAME). I personally feel that I'm here and I very much want to be here and be present for the experience. Sometimes the experiences these days, I found the group to be large. I might like the opportunity to be in a smaller group, personally. That's a way of me saying it's fme for me for those who are here to go on.
F: I would like to propose that we condense our circle and expand it as people come to join us.
F: Absolutely. And guess what chairs will get pulled in!
M: The comfortable ones!
(Chatter as moving.)
F: One of the things that I am ambivalent about proceeding without some people is that some of the stuff that I have to deal with and I'm not alone, I think there are some other people on the staff will speak for themselves -but some of the stuff that I want to deal with has to do with my experience with the other people who aren't here, as well as . . . (laughter as the singing alarm along starts again . . . some chatter around it)
F: I didn't know I was going to be this source of entertainment!
F: Now you know how (person on a demonstration tape) feels!
M: Musical concert!
F: We could have featured that on our flyer! Then we would've gotten more people!
M: talking watch!
M: Did you take a walk down the hall ...
F: Do you remember when we were young, (NAME), there used to be somebody with her violin on the radio -oh, it was a man! (NAME) and his violin! And it was dinner music. Real sweet, slick. We'd hear on the radio, "(NAME) and his violin!" And I'm thinking...
F: Now, I warn you, there'll be more of that in five minutes!
M: Then would we say you're late?
M: What will it say in five minutes? Does it have the same repertoire?
F: Well, this time, the first time it just plays the tune. And tells the time. The next time it says the time, "10:05. Please hurry." And the last time it just goes through the whole process again.
M: In five minutes.
F: In five minutes. So I just wanted everybody to know that so you won't be surprised. And I can't stop it, because no matter what we try to do, it still goes on at 10:00. So, (NAME), I hope you're ready for an interruption in about three minutes.
F: I'm not gonna start! (laughter)
M: You're lucky it doesn't happen at 2 am! You'd have to hide it in the kitchen drawer or something.
M: Does it happen every twelve hours - it happens at 10 pm, too?
F: It happens at ten in the morning.
M: Oh,okay.
F: Yes, just one time.
M: That's interesting.
F: For a while we got the wrong button. The wrong button was pushed, and it got me up every hour. (laughter) There's always a trade-off, you know. I'd be lost without this, but sometimes I wish it would get lost!
F: Staff noise? Are those people who ...
F: They're staff people.
(long silence)
F: (NAME), I was just kind of reflecting on what you'd said about sometimes you were more comfortable with a smaller group. And I, uh, I hope that if that persists for you throughout the rest of the weekend, that you would bring that up again. And maybe you can get something like that to happen for you, if that's what you want.
M: I think . .. I thought about bringing it up ...
(NAME)' s watch goes off again.)
M: I don't know if you know it, but John was dancing to that. (laughter)
F: I wish I could have seen it!
M: Just now?
M: Yeah. (laughter)
M: Morning!
M: Morning.
M: Morning.
M: Morning.
F: This feels cruel! (laughter)
M: I want to fmish what I was saying, (NAME). I think I've enjoyed the larger group. I thought about what it would be like to divide up into two smaller groups, if that would might be a different experience. As I've experienced the larger group, there are times when there's almost a smaller group that's very active at anyone moment, and other people maybe back off a little bit, or tune out, or other times subgroups interact. So in some ways the smaller group gets expressed in the larger group.
F: The large group becomes a series of small groups shifting in composition from time-to-time.
M: Mmm hmm. With a lot of freedom for people to engage when they need to.
F: And yet those who are not in the small group at the moment can witness what th~ small group is doing.
M: I've sort of felt the same thing. I've noticed myself sometimes almost observing what's going on because I didn't necessarily really feel part of it. But that was interesting, too. I was listening to the people, but I didn't have, feel, myself in the group, I felt myself on the outside. But that was interesting, too, but watching how people do and how people help each other, and that was also very exciting to me.
F: It's another valuable way ofbeing in a group.
M: Mmm hmm ...
M: I think for me being in the large group is that, sometimes" . when things get too intense, I have, I have the option of like backing off a little bit. And, especially things that happen in the group, like going from an emotional-based. to an intellectual-based conversation as a way of relieving pressure in the group. See when (NAME) came in on Thursday night as a way of relieving tension that was going on in the group.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B9
F: ... opening the door and saying, "This is (NAME)'s secret room." I don't know that you've done that with him. You may not have. But I feel that you with me have opened the door and said, "Here is (NAME)'s inner room. Here is (NAME)'s inner room." And I feel uncomfortable as hell. I feel as if I'm being disrespectful of (NAME) and (NAME) in participating. And I told (NAME) clearly, and you know this. He came to me in June, and wanted to unload on me things that were going on in his relationship with you, and I told him I could not be a part of that. And that was my love and respect for you. That was what was motivating me. And I don't
(Interruption: phone call for someone.)
F: (cont.) I don't think you and I agree on this, (NAME), and we may never I can live with that. I can accept you as having attitudes and values that are different from mine. But there are some things I am unwilling to be a part of. And it sounds as though you and I have a different idea ... I hear that you have been making, you have been aware of my need, and have felt as though you were responding to it. It seems to me that we did not communicate clearly on specifically what that need entailed. And I appreciate your response to my need, even though I did not receive it. I believe you. That you were doing so. The other thing, I feel really defensive when you continue to point out who it is and who it is not that I am intimately involved with. And the assumption, and the assumption, that since I am primarily in contact with one person, that I therefore am in some state of deprivation. I resent that conclusion, (NAME). I hear you say that you felt crazy. I am deeply engaged in a very productive intellectual phase of my life, and I continue, for less than a year. I have deliberately narrowed the field, my social field. I am so engrossed in my work, passionately, that I don't feel a particular neediness for people for anything. I feel a particular need for more solitude than more relating with people right now. And I believe you understand what that's about in my life.
F: My intention, (NAME), was not that you're suffering a loss of contact with people, my intention was if this is how it is for me, how must it be for you. And I believe that is the question. And I did not make any implication. I raised the question. And you answered the question. It's okay for you.
F: It is between you and me.
F: If you're separating yourself from your friends in (city) and with me, and I'm freaked out about it, and I have all this support system around me, what must it be like ... and I did not say, "It must be terrible for you," what must it be like for you? answered my question! What I heard in that...
F: I'm feeling, I'm feeling just really judged when you say, "What must it be like for you?" to me and I read in that, and I own it. I read in that, "It must be shit for you!"
F: Well, I'm raising the question ...
F: nd it's <i>not </i>shit for me.
F: But I certa e e oor open for you to acknowledge that, and not to hear it as a judgment on my part of what your life is like.
F: I felt some judgment, too
F: And even if I did, to whatever extent I felt that maybe you were hurting because of loss of people contact, my mind state was a compassionate one, and I don't believe you heard that. you don't want my compassion. And maybe that's a piece of shit for you to hear compassion from me. But you heard it.
F: It's hard for me to take it in when I'm feeling angry.
F: What you want is a different of rules. Anything on between (NAME) and me or whatever relatlO IpS (?), because these people who are important to you and other people in my life who you don't know. That's what I hear.
F: Other people in your life who you might share information with me about, I'm not in contact with, and don't experience the kind of discomfort and craziness that I do. If you told your wife, (NAME), everything about me, and I imagine over the years you've told her a lot, it doesn't fire anything up in me. I'm not involved with (NAME). I don't engage in encounters with her in which I say, "Does she know this? What does she know that she's not saying?" I have never been in a situation like this in my life, and it's new for me. And I told you this in August - I think it's an infantile part in me that feels judgmental - that I felt angry that - I'm smiling because I know that it sounds like a little boy! - you developed a relationship with (NAME) and (NAME). And it sort of fucked things up for me. my relationship with you. And my relationship with (NAME) and (NAME). I think I've spoken to the adult part of that, and I think it's a good thing.
F: We may be at an impasse on that.
F: Well, I don't feel like an impasse, because I know precisely how I intend to be. And
F: And so do I.
F: Yeh.
F: And I will share some things about (NAME) and (NAME), and you will continue to back off. And you will continue to back off. You will continue to not share with me.
F: My commitment to you, and to (NAME) and to (NAME), is that I will, and it involves some judgment on my part, I will certainly share that, "Yeah, (NAME) came to my house. We hung out with (NAME) we talked all night.
F: Will you do that?
F: But if (NAME) talks with me about himself or other people, I'm not going to share that with other people. I'm clear on that. And I'm also increasingly clear that, and this is the part that I feel I haven't been genuine about, I have not communicated you about as it's happening as often as I would like to, when I am feeling uncomfortable. I tend to feel in the moment, "Oh, shit, here it is!" Then let it happen and feel like shit. I'm going to stop doing that. I'm going to let you know. I would like to, as much as I can, to let you know as it's happening. And that I wouldprefer not to, not to be privy to this information.
F: The little boy in me feels like since I became friends with your friends, you're going to punish me.
F: And I feel that since, since I left (city) and went away, that I have felt punished by you, by "I can't have you, so I'll go to your friends and talk. And I'll take your friends away." That's the little boy in me. What I want you to hear, and I want (NAME) to hear, is a deep, deep respect for your experience, and the kind of trust that I want you to have in me is that what you share with me is inviolable. I am not going to be taking that elsewhere. That's how I want to be trustworthy. You may not choose too do that yourself. That's what I'm choosing for me.
F: I want you to know that I've heard that when I share anything about (NAME) or (NAME) with you, I've heard that, it raises a different set of responses in you, than when I share other relationships with you. I want you to know that I hear that. I'm not sure that you hear how crazy I feel.
F: Do you feel unheard?
F: That's right. I feel unheard when I tell you how crazy I feel, feeling a different set of rules for those two people for me than for other relationships we share.
F: I'd like to offer you my understanding. My understanding is that it confuses the shit out of you. It makes you feel disoriented and crazy when, for seven or eight years, you and I had shared without censor details about other people who are in our lives. Including intimate details. And I admit, prior to the time that you were involved with (NAME) and (NAME), before you had a relationship with them, probably more so with (NAME) I would from time-to-time tell you about struggles that I perceived (NAME) to be having. And that feels crazy. That feels strange. That stopped like <i>that!</i> (snaps fmgers) when you started being close to (NAME). And you just don't GET, you just don't understand how I could make such a dichotomy, it doesn't make sense to you.
F: That part is not true. I do understand. I just feel crazy trying to meet that need of yours.
F: Oh, okay.
F: And I don't know if I can.
F: And you may not want to.
F: I have attempted. And thought that I was successful. And once again, I hear that I am not.
F: So the craziness is having thought that you understood clearly what I needed, and attempted to meet the need, believing that you were meeting it, and then hearing today that you don't get it.
F: And even feeling some craziness in me that because it's so different from other relationships, yet also feeling that this is dragging on. And we haven't heard from (NAME).
F: I feel fmished. I feel like I'm repeating myself.
F: I do, too.
(long silence)
M: (weeping) It's been painful for me, (NAME). To watch you two struggle. Not just today. Over this time. This year. These months.? until now. Knowing how much you love each other. How much I love both of you. I feel with (NAME) that ~<i>m\\..</i>~ \ I'm a member of something I feel responsible for, and I don't want to be responsible for it. Like, I feel like, I feel like in some ways I've gotten away with a new relationship, and I don't know why that is, I don't know how it happened. I don't know what else to say. (NAME), I heard what you said, I listened. And it's helped me understand more of who you are. I'm glad I could hear those things. I haven't always sure how to understand it, the tension I've felt, and I, umrn, I don't know. I feel awkward. Umm, I feel awkward because I value our friendship. I felt a sense of loss that you'd gone away geographically, and I haven't had the time to make it to visit you as much as I'd like. I feel awkward that I met (NAME) through you. I feel like I didn't, that at fIrst it didn't feel okay to have a friendship with (NAME) because (NAME) was your friend, and that was okay with me. I don't look at (NAME) as your friend, I think in some way that you've given me messages that that's okay to have a friendship with (NAME). That it's okay with (NAME). Umm, I just, I don't know if I'm making much sense. I'm feeling confused and it's painful for me to see you struggle. It's painful for me to be part of that in some way. I want to defend you, (NAME), I want to defend you, (NAME). I want to explain things to you, but I'm not going to do that. That's your stuff. I don't have any more to say. I just need to sit with it for awhile. I don't have anything more to say.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B10
F: I hesitate to say this, because I hope it won't be taken as an expectation or a plan ... I'm wondering if there might be a value in setting aside in the short time for the women to meet together and the men to meet together if they chose, and then come back together again. I think I did hear the term "male-dominated group" in the sense ofnumbers, and certainly in the sense ofparticipation or taking part, and I offer that as a possibility. I'm reminded of an experience once in the (country), in which I suggested that we might want to have a women's group, and the men immediately said they felt discriminated against. And I said, "Perhaps you are being discriminated against, but I hadn't heard any man say that he would like to have a men's group." And fmally they did, we did, have a women's group, and they discovered they did have a great deal to talk about. And when later I asked what the men's group did, they said went out and had beer. Now that was the (country), and I was thinking when you spoke about being accustomed to more "macho men," not the kind of men you see here who are very warm and human and share their feelings. It's such a contrast as that came back to me. So I would be glad to hear if what I just said struck a note with any of the women or with any of the men who would like to respond to it.
F: I think it's a wonderful idea that you people meet and that we go out and have a beer. (Laughter.)
M: You mean, you're gonna buy us a beer.
M: Maybe women should go out and have the beer?
F: Maybe the women will go out and have a beer!
F: I don't feel the need to meet exclusively with the men, but I would certainly support and honor if the women decide that they wish to meet with themselves. And if, by fate, that put me in a men's group, that would be fine with me. It's not something I seek.
F: In a men's group or no group at all ...
F: Mmm hmm. And that might be something I would choose.
F: You might choose to have some time?
F: Yes.
F: Some time.
M: There was an earlier request for a smaller group.
F: What?
M: There was an earlier request for a smaller group.
F: I made this request in (city), and announced that there would be a smaller room for the women to come to after the session if they were interested. Then someone came up and whispered to me just as I was leaving for that room, and said we had to change the room, because I thought there might be fifteen or twenty women, and it turned out that there were over a hundred. So you can never tell.
M: I guess I would go along with that, but I'm going to sit and.
M: I know what I think. I guess that's what everyone is waiting for. I don't know, I don't know if I would want to segregate, but then again it would put apart, but I don't know ...
M: I don't know, I don't see it as segregating. It's just something different.
M: I don't know if we <i>need</i> to, I've just noticed how this side ofthe room it's empty. it's all men, and you know I have ...
F: Four ofthe women are missing ... are not here, also.
F: Anybody have a sense of ...
M: I know they were speaking privately. I don't know what about.
M: ... they're outside.
F: And somebody came in this morning and asked, (NAME), I think, gave them a telephone message. Was that any crisis for her?
M: Her grandmother died.
M: Oh, no.
F: Was she expecting that.
M: Yes.
M: Sort of.
M: Sort of.
M: I talked with her at lunch time, (NAME).
M: (NAME)' s grandmother died.
F: Oh, her grandmother died.
M: Actually, I'm kind of impressed that she did come straight to group, 'cause I was talking with her about this, and, umm, she said she might just take a nap or whatever for awhile. I just thought that, I wrote, that she could bring it up if we wanted to.
F: I don't need to talk about it. I just needed to know. Now to talk about it for me would be something I don't want to do because she's not here.
M: I seem to be the only one who's feeling any sort of "leftoutness," so I don't know if anyone else would be interested. I would be interested -I would be interested, but don't think it's actually necessary, but it might be interesting ...
F: I don't conclude that you're the only one who feels left out, only one of the women, when four of the women aren't even in the room. Certainly now. I don't know if they feel left out.
F: I'm not sure how many of the women in the group are not here.
M: Four?
F: Four?
M: Well, three, now.
M: (NAME), I personally don't have that need.
F: I'm wondering if that says anything about what we're talking about.
F: If what says anything? The absence of women? (NAME)? You just said you wonder if that means something.
F: Yes.
F: And I didn't understand what you were talking about.
F: I wonder if maybe four women -four women out of the number of women who are here is quite a large number. If... granting that one person has apparently been called away, is that right?
F: No ...
M: No, she got the message.
F: She got the message, but she's still here.
M: She's not here right now.
F: But the other three ... I don't know whether it ... did it ... there's nothing special for them this afternoon and they're taking some time, or whether there is any connection between their not being here and something about the women not feeling, well, feeling as semi-observers and interested in what's going on and not taking that much part. I don't know. I don't know. I don't have the answer.
M: The people who have the answer are not here.
M: For me, I don't think that's it at all. I can see how you feel that way, but for me I think it's nice to see things, like, men communicating like this and it's nice. Feels good.
M: I think, you know, I sort of mentioned last night it was interesting to see the women start identifying about the relationships with their fathers.
F: Mmm hmm. A couple.
M: Last night. And it was my impression that it was open forum, people could jump in at will, and I didn't see it as revolving around men's issues as around life's issues.
F: (NAME), I just asked about the urgent telephone call you. got this morning, and somebody said that your grandfather had died...
M: My grandmother.
F: Grandmother? And I want you to know that.
M: I was kind of afraid to tell about it. It was very strange, because last night (NAME), (NAME), and I sat up for a few hours, and I was talking about my grandmother, and how I wanted her to die because she hasn't been alive for five years. And she wanted death a long time ago. And today I feel a big relief for her but I feel guilty because last night when I was talking about it, she was dying, and I feel like, I don't know, guilty. And confused. And I was just afraid to come in and say it. I just feel like I'm wrong for feeling this way. That I'm not that sad, and I'm not crying about it that much. I said good-bye to her a couple of years ago. And I was going to go home, but my mother said, "I think you should stay, because it's probably the best thing for you right now." So I'm staying. I don't know if maybe I should go home. I feel bad that I don't feel worse.
M: You said you wanted her death long time ago.
M: (NAME), I don't know if you can hear this, but feelings aren't wrong. They're yours.
M: It's just very ironic because of the conversation we had last night. You know.
F: I get the impression that your grandmother has now what she wanted. You wanted her to have what she wanted. I want you to know that if you choose to stay here, that I intend to continue this.
M: Thank you.
If she had known what she'd done, she might have wanted more.
M: I just think if she had heard me last night, she'd be angry with me.
F: Kind of feeling like you let her down when she really might have needed you.
M: Yes.
M: Mmm hmm.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B11
M: You know, when you say there are some male things, yeah, there are some. But I don't feel it here, but there are other things, too. Maybe that's just me.
M: I really guess I'm glad you brought it up because. And that's one thought of mine. I get so sick when I hear "male this, male that." I want to say will you cut that bullshit, we're people. That's what I want to be thought of as. And I guess 'cause in some ways growing up I had an easier time and felt more comfortable with my mom, so I identified more with female characteristics. Listening, being intuitive, hearing.
M: Those are female?
M: I don't know.
M: I feel a lot of that in men today.
M: I know. That's a fairly stereotypical.
M: I've seen a lot of those characteristics in men and women. And I just ... I share your feelings about ... 
M: I just said that ... I couldn't let ... into it.
M: I agree with you. I agree with you, (NAME), I mean (NAME). I agree with what you said.
M: They just put a in your ?
M: I agree with what you just said.
M: You agree that ... I don't know, I just get tired of whether it's this sex or that sex.
M: I hear ya.
M: When you talk about male or female issues, it's a big issue for me, because of my sexual orientation. It's a big issue when you start talking labels. Like you're supposed to feel this, you're supposed to feel that. This is my issue and that's your issue. It's like, "Screw you, I'm human too. So you may not have the same viewpoint as me about what I do about what I do in my bedroom, but that's tough. It's ... I'm still human, and I have feelings, and I have issues just like you.
M: I think the thing that is interesting is that women get stuck by labels with men. In that (NAME) said, you were surprised at your mom's mechanicalness at one point. Because women are supposed to be the ones who know how to do it -nurture and all that stuff, but if it never happens to me, how am I gonna know how to do it, just because I'm a Woman. You know, if! was never, just becallse I'm a woman doesn't mean I am necessarily, I mean, society says I do and I'd better to figure it. But I'm having a lot of trouble with that because I have blocked so much of myself out, and I have these tremendous holes. And I don't want tqqo,othatotolhy daughter. So in a sense it's like it's not acceptable for women not to know how to feel. So I mean, we're stuck, we're trapped.
M: like that for me, too. ?
M: I think I we had this conversation in the anteroom first. Right? it's exactly about how we're programmed. And I hate feeling programmed.
M: Men aren't supposed to have feelings.
M: I guess people aren't supposed to have feelings.
M: Yeah, really.
M: Now that I can relate to.
M: And I've b6en ill enough meetings to know... to hear it said time and again,jthere may be slight variations, but basically it's all the same. I can identify so much with some of the feelings that women have, that men have. And it's the somehow we all got stuck in. For me, anyways, I feel I've been stuck into this rut.
M: Something that happened earlier today and it's repeating itself now, but I think it was (NAME), I'm not sure who ... maybe someone else talking about expressing your feelings or crying and that not being okay. And I felt a bond there, or a common bond with you women -something that I have usually felt with men, about our difficulty of us expressing our feelings on getting in touch with our feelings. And kind of a solidarity that we'd work on that and support each other on that and always taking it for granted that women are good at that shit. They don't have difficulty with that, and, umm ...
M: And for me it means that if we do, I feel a lot of blame for not being a competent woman. You know.
M: Competent woman, meaning ...?
M: Meaning somebody who knows how, I know how to take care of people, but I mean that really knows how to get in touch with the feeling side and to nurture that, and to be emotional, and all of those things that we're supposed to be able to handle. We're supposed to be the ones to be able to handle all that stuff to be competent as a woman, and, therefore, the message to me has always been that I'm incompetent. No matter how much I do, I'm incompetent.
M: I hear you. I'm never right. I cry too much, or never show my feelings. When am I going to be right? It's really hard.
M: I heard you say, (NAME), that you felt understanding. You felt bonded with us.
M: I did. You heard me.
M: That you could say, "Wow, it's not just us!"
M: Yeah, it's not just us and them.
M: Yeah, it's everybody. It's common ... maybe not as common ... it's common and I can relate to that. I felt bonded when you said that.
M: I'm really glad you said that. I don't know why I haven't experienced that. Maybe I haven't been open to hearing women express that. That type of vulnerability. I don't know. But it was for me a breakthrough.
M: I guess it was very important for you that you said that.
M: Getting back to what (NAME) said, can we all be people together instead ofjust genders.
M: Yeh.
M: And I guess I just meant it as I said it. And I didn't mean it to come out sounding like I was a bigot.
M: You didn't sound like a bigot.
M: I've been sitting here for a good ten minutes thinking about what I said.
M: Feeling like a bigot? (Laughter.) I didn't mean you came across as sounding bigoted. I think, it came across to me, and it was on target for labels, I'm tired of this bullshit.
M: And I heard that, too. And I'm so tired.
M: Boy, I'm so glad that it was. Thanks, (NAME).
M: For?
M: Back to me?
M: Yeah, coming back.
M: 'Cause I didn't know how long I WAS going to sit there and retreat.
M: It seems like I cut in on you both. Like I wasn't listening. Like I was harping on one word that you said, and maybe that you didn't mean, and I'm sorry. 


M: Thanks. Yeh. I used to avoid that stuff. I didn't want to. 


(Facilitators reenter.)
M: Maybe we should pretend we've been staring at each other for the last 45 minutes.
F: Thanks for the ride. I feel embarrassed. You've reserved a chair for me as if my name was on it.
M: It is. It's written right here! (Laughter.)
F:  One time, one time at the workshop where I met you, (NAME), there were seats around the edge of the room. Most people were sitting on the floor in the middle, and my butt was sore, and there was a chair on the side of the room. And, uh, so I got up and I took it, and everybody said, "That's Carl's chair!" And I said, "Well, it looks like he's going to have to figure out another place to sit!" And they were pissed with me. But I stayed there. And I would not buy in. And I also park in doctors' parking spaces. (Laughter.) And ministers' . (Laughter. ) 


M: W, I just wanted to say something to you, in response to you, that it felt really good that you heard me. I heard what you were saying, and in response, it felt really good that you heard me. I didn't know if anyone would really hear me. But it felt good, though.
M: I heard you. I don't always show it. Sometimes I don't always hear you. Sometimes I do. I heard you.
M: I'd like to thank the three leaders for giving us the opportunity to deal with each other.  I guess I would like to thank, thank you. 'Cause I felt since last night, that the group deal with something.
F: I wish I had been here. That's all I can say. You're welcome for that space. And I wish that I had been here, also.
M: I figured you would say that.
M: I feel like four people just joined the group. ?
M: I defmitely feel very good about being here now.
(Long silence.)
M: You can always watch the tape later. (Some laughter.)
F: The timing was good, then, for you?
M: I think the timing was good for the group, too.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B12
F: ... from my perspective that's how it happened, but I don't even know if it's useful for you to know that.
M: I didn't come here claiming you to be my father, either. In fact, I don't really think I ever believed in transference till now. And I really don't want you to feel awful, but there's something in it for you, too. And I don't want to say, "It's okay, (NAME)." ...
F: Yeh ...
M: ...and then to you.
F: And for that I'm learning (can't make it out). I'm okay to just stay here and keep on sharing with you. And I'm also okay that I might not need to know when you need to stop, and I trust that when that time comes, you'll let me know.
M: I actually kind of feel the spell was broken and that maybe I need to process a little bit what just happened. But I haven't forgotten your invitation.
F: Thanks. And you're entitled to it.
(Long, long silence.)
M: (NAME), I'm sorry that I wasn't here 'when whatever happened, but I'm glad you got the opportunity to to discuss this issue. It's a relief for you.
M: It's a relief for you?
M: No, I said I'm glad YOU were able to fmd some relief in it.
M: Oh, thank you.
M: I didn't get any relief from it!
(Long silence.)
M: (NAME), I need to say something to you. Earlier, when I was feeling a lot like a lot of self and everything, I felt very connected to you, and to (NAME), and to (NAME). I didn't feel the need to say anything, it's almost as if I could feel it with you (NAME), and that I didn't need to say I felt the connection or that I felt cared for.
F: When?
M: Earlier, when I was feeling the joy and was celebrating - I could celebrate with you, and I didn't have to say that to you (to NAME), though I may have. I don't think I said to you that I felt connected to you also. And it's almost as if I left you, with you having given me so much of yourself at that moment. I didn't say that to you. I'm sorry.
F: I don't feel that.
M: I still/just feel to you.
M: I wasn't sure, (NAME) just asked you something, (NAME), and I heard you had need to process. And I didn't know if that was now, with the group, or if that was on your own.
M: I think I need some personal time to think about it.
M: Okay. I wasn't sure, and I needed to ask.
F: (NAME), I was thinking about soyou, umm, (NAME) and I had some very important interaction here, as you indicated you were aware of, and it's clear to me that it  was probably impossible for you to hear it. Umm, and it made me think of some times in p-c groups when I have been not able hear, and I walk over and I sit in front of people, and I, so that I can hear. And I've been chastIsed for that. And I've been told that that's manipulative. I've been told that that is caretaking, and that it also shuts out the rest of the group. And, umm, sometimes I do it anyway. And then I can hear. But most of the time I don't, because I don't want to bring up that old stuff that feels awful for me. I don't want to risk having that said to me again... So I don't do it.
F: I feel you really understand how it feels, and I think you're right, I do speak up at times, and sometimes I get tired of doing it and don't. And then I just wait it out.
F: And sometimes it's a long wait.
F: Right. And just before I spoke to (NAME), there, I felt so frustrated that if I didn't say something I was going to scream, because I sensed that something very important was going on, and I didn't want to stop it. I, umm, my thought was that I would let (NAME) know that, I would ask her if she wanted to tell me something about what was going on. And I appreciate that, (NAME). I don't know how to deal with it, either. I feel that I put out my needs and choices that we have, and that when people have been able to do it, they have responded so that I could hear and be part of it, and I can't expect, I don't have expectation that everybody will be able to do it all the time.
F: Right.
F: And I don't have any right to expect that. But it has felt very good when many of you have, especially raised your voices and addressed me so that I could listen. I could really hear what was going on.
F: Sometimes, sometimes I think about opera singers who are singing, who are singing a love duet, and they are singing such tender, loving messages to each other. They're two inches from each other, from each other's face, and they're screaming their lungs out so that you can hear it in the back of the auditorium, and I was thinking...
F: That's one ofthe reasons I don't like opera! (laughter)
F: It may be one of the reasons that when I'm feeling very intimate with a person ...
F: It's true ...
F: ... I just won't, I just won't raise my voice. And I've, I'm frustrated about it.
F: And I know that, too, because I know I do it too. So what l'm trying to do is to fmd my way in here. And I haven't found it, but I'll keep on trying, and hope that I find some way, somewhere, that I feel relatively comfortable with.
M: (NAME) has a suggestion you might want to try. (NAME gives her earphones.) See how you like it.
F: How's this? Can you hear anything now??
F: I certainly can! Hello, (NAME)! (She calls; group laughs excitedly, joyously.) 
F: I'm right here!
F: I know you're right here! Okay! Talk away!
F: (NAME), that was brilliant!
F: You know, that is brilliant!
M: It was (NAME)'s idea!
F: It was (NAME)'s idea!
F: Okay, (NAME), you're brilliant!
F: I'm wondering how it is back here (from back ofthe room). I wonder ifyou can hear me now?
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B13
M: (Weeping as he talks:) ... and stuff like that. And some girl would telephone and that would happen. And it didn't help me any. get away from the subject. That's just an example of how it's changed. Umm, during the second semester. I had another bird. His name was __bird. We called him __bird. I found he got cancer, too. He had cancer of the throat, so I felt really bad about it. But I feIt stronger. You know, you know. A lot of deaths had been taken... I felt immune to it, you know. So the doctor gave me a decision of whether or not to put him to sleep or not. And to this day, I do not know whether or not I did the right thing. And I'll never know, because it was all on me. And the reasons why I put him to sleep in every way and form, ranging from I didn't want to deal with it next year when I go to school to I love him and I didn't want to see him in pain. One of the reasons that really hurt me, that entered my head was put him to sleep cost $8, and to try to  save him cost $11. that money didn't have anything to do with it I'll never know, because I made the choice to do it and I was there until the end. When he put the needle in his chest. I chose to be there there. I was going to be there to the end because people were there for me because they loved me. See? I'll always be there for anyone until the end. When he put the needle in his chest, I thought I was wrong to watch, but there was nothing I could do about it. I watched him die a slow death - slow meaning 10 seconds. But it was very painful for me. But i t was my own choice, my own decision, whether or not, I did that, right or wrong in my own opinion it was over and done with, and I had the choice. That's the positive thing about it. It was the best thing I could have done, I think, in a way, even though it might have been wrong now, you know? It was cancer. But that's the end of that story. So here I am. My dad died on me and now my animals, all the ones I'd grown up with, ever since my father was alive, have been offed one-by-one or by a disease or by other people. Now, I just found out this semester, our cat has heartworm. And for that we had to put him on arsenic. And if any of you know anything about this, cats aren't supposed to get heartworm. It's unusual that they do. And if they do, the only way to get rid of them is to put them on arsenic, which is deadly to them, and he doesn't have much chance to live. I know he will die soon. Because I have seen enough death, and I know when it's coming. And I have to accept this one, too. It really hurts all these deaths are coming to me that I feel I have no one left. Except for me. And I've really lived with that. And so, it's not really a problem in general. It's just these feelings have been inside me, and they really hurt. I know that to go on living and to grow and I need to get into better relationships - girlfriends, you know with one or two girlfriends, but it's going to be really hard to open up. I mean, because one girl that I went with, I've started jumping. I hope you guys are getting this. It's really hard for me, for you to understand truly how I feel.
F: It's important.

M: Maybe you can learn from it too, I don't know, but, (NAME), my ex-girlfriend. I've had people come to me and tell me they hear she's a lesbian, and that really doesn't help my psyche because, wow, I lost to a girl. Which is one way to look at it. And another way to look at it is that l was the only guy she could have had. That, well, that she chose to have before she entered this.  I don't know whether or not it's right, I don't know whether or not it's wrong. It just pisses me off that I worked hard, and I tried so hard and I trusted someone and then because of problems, I can't blame her even though I'd like to, because there were problems between me and her that happened, and now left and right, the other ones that were with me my whole life, left and right, are dying on me. And I don't know where that's leaving me. But it's changed me, and that's why why I wanted to come here. I think I mentioned that to you, (NAME), because I'm changing and I like it. And I don't like using people. And it's not my way to deal with the fact that I can't get over this so I'll open up to people. You see? So for now, the best thing for me to do, I guess, is to stay back and just feel this fear and know and understand that it's going to take time for me to get over this and time to open up into another relationship. But, umm, this is what I've been feeling like. This is what I've been hoping very much when you, I'm sorry, was it you, you know, (NAME) brought up her gf and you brought up (NAME) It really struck me. Because you saw (NAME) to the end, and (NAME) wished she did, and I wanted to say, (gf) is it difficult to see them to the end, especially when it's your own choice. Especially when you believe that you were pretty much wrong and that choice happens, you have no control. You understand?
M: Yes.
M: Maybe if he'd died in his sleep, like with my former bird, I wish I could have done something else, but I couldn't. I like giving people everything they got. You know? I don't like to take away people's lives, I don't like to hurt people and stuff. And that was the first decision I'd done to do that and I was wrong. I don't know. And if I've said things that contradict themselves I'd like someone to tell me, because I can explain it. I know what I'm talking about. I know everything that I've done. I've gone through it before with myself. I've never gone through it with other people. And I'd appreciated it if no one told (NAME) anyone about that lesbian thing. It wouldn't go well. Does everyone understand?
F: Yes.
M: But, umm, it hurts and I've accepted that and I just hope that sharing this with you and hopefully that you can learn from this, and that I can open myself up enough to open myself up into another relationship and finally love. As much as I'd like other people to love me, I don't have my animals anymore, I only have me. I'd like that to be different. I'm not the person who I am now. I want to be the person who I was. Who was open and sensitive and was willing to share themselves with other people. Which, of course, you guys are going to say, "(NAME), you already did." But I think I've said that pretty completely. But, if I haven't, please tell me. I haven't cried like that in a long time. Feels very good, doesn't it? It feels very good.
F: I don't want to leave you hanging there. I don't suspect that, nor does anyone else. Umm, and it's very easy for me to say you already did. You just opened up. You just cried. But for me it feels like you let me, others, me at least come into you and feel some of that, some of that loss, loss, loss. (Long silence.) I struggle to know just what that means to you that you let me in, but to me it means that I know you better, it means that I've shared some grief with you. I've wept with you. You came so clear to me that you are alone. That you are full of capacity for love, and so thirsty to be loved in the way that you can give, that you can love.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B14
F: Well, I'm more interested in talking about what happened rather than the content of it, because it was dealing with someone who isn't here now and I had something to do with it. With my relationship with that person. But I'm ...you're telling me that you'd like to be able to listen better...you miss that....and some other things from time to time. And you don't like that. Youo really feel sorry about that. Thank you.
M: I think I hear you saying that you felt left out twice, and I got the sense the first time when everyone was joking and you said you felt awful. I felt bad about that. And then, and then, (NAME), I could see you struggling when everyone was celebrating, and you couldn't celebrate and when (NAME) shared that, part of me wanted to say, "Thank you for sharing that, (NAME)." And I could celebrate with him. And part of me didn't want to say that, and I didn't, because I felt you were left out. And at the same time I didn't want to respond and say, "You felt left out" because, like (NAME), I felt I would be touching a subject that was...
F: A no-no.
M: Right.
F: Nothing is no-no that comes out of the group. And you witnessed some of it this morning. So, so for me it wouldn't have been a no-no, and I don't think it would have been for (NAME), either. Because we shared it in the group. But I don't expect that that's the way you saw it at the time. I hear you say it at the time, and you were being respectful. So it's making better sense to me that my grinding gut statement didn't get picked up, because it seemed to the two of you that that conflict ws something private between (NAME) and me, and you didn't want to violate that.
M: I think I did pick that up, but I didn't validate it.
M: I had a real hard time when (NAME) was celebrating. Because I couldn't, didn't want to, was able to live it after that. Probably because I guess I knew where you were, or I thought I knew where you were.
F: I was just glad that it was mentioned. I'm doubly glad now to hear it come from you that somebody said that maybe everyone isn't gonna celebrate.
M: (NAME) himself said that
F: (NAME) said that.
M: I wasn't fuckin' celebrating at all.
F: And I thought maybe (NAME) wasn't celebrating either.
M: I could feel it, but I wasn't celebrating. But I could feel it.
M: I personally thought it was pretty shitty of him to do that. But I also think he related it to his remark at that time rather than to keep going so he isn't left out.
F: Absolutely. Absolutely. I don't want to discuss (NAME) here.
M: (NAME), I need to say something, umm, about that incident that you were just talking about (NAME), the grinding gut. And the fact that you felt nullified all night. I know exactly what you meant. And, uh, chose not to do anything about it. You, more than anybody else in the room, would be the one to celebrate with (NAME). The fact that you couldn't do that must have felt like hell.
F: It was strange and beautiful to see you, (NAME), celebrating with (NAME). It was beautiful to see you so excited. You were really excited about your friendship with (NAME). He was! It was something to be excited about, really excited about. He was.
M: ~fmish what I was going to say. I knew what you were feeling. At least I had a sense of the size of the depth of it and how much that was painful for you. I chose not to do anything about it, I think out of that same anger in some ways, in some ways what I've been thinking about is that sometimes in spite of what's going on this weekend, I wonder if I allow you to be human. To be you.
M: I don't know what this means about me, but I'm gonna say it. Just how I felt it. You came in late, twice, with (NAME). And reasons I completely understand -(NAME) walks in and you just had found out about her grandmother. And (NAME) was talking, but there was a silence and you really wanted to connect her in it. I knew it wasn't out of malice. And then a similar situation comes when you try to connect with (NAME). But that wasn't okay with me I guess. And, uh, I feel bad about it.
F: And I thought that. That sort of thing. You were feeilng punitive and I felt it, because I had left you and I deserved to be left. You left me because I left you twice...you don't like that. You said I came in late. And I also hear you say something about yourself.
M: I don't like that about myself. I wouldn't do that.
F: I remember one of my colleagues one time, a student WAS talking about one of my colleagues, a professor. The student said something about "You're not consistent! You just did two things that aren't consistent!" He said, "Yeah, I guess you're discovering that sometimes I'm inconsistent." And the student said, "What? It's okay with you that you're inconsistent?" "Of course, that's part of me." Yeah, (NAME), I'm human. I fuck up a lot. I didn't fuck up by coming in late, though. That's not a fuck-up. That was a gift to you. But I don't want to diminish the fact that it means something different to you.
M: How did you put it? That you can fuck up. I think it's really neat that you can say that. I'm impressed with that because understood, I heard you before saying that I'm, that, how'd you word it? That oftentimes you could revert to "I'm a bad boy" type attitude. I saw this as not so much as "I'm a bad boy," but as, "I screwed up. I accepted it." You hear what I'm saying? You didn't take it as ...You understood it ...
F: I didn't take it as mommy punishing me, as criticizing me.
M: Right.J don't know ifthat makes any connection with you. Or if it's the wrong connection.
F: You're making a good connection. Uh, I shared with you that I make mistakes. And I shared with you that sometimes I feel like people are telling me that I'm a bad boy. I don't feel anyone was telling me that I was a bad boy this afternoon. This evening. I've alluded a couple times during this workshop that when I was little I thought that when I grew up I'd have it together. I wouldn't make mistakes, I wouldn't have a grinding gut. When I was a little kid, I had a lot of grinding gut. When I got to be 35, surely by 35 - that's old - I wouldn't get it and I wouldn't hurt anymore. Big people don't hurt. Of course not. And it didn't go away. It got better. It got so it wouldn't happen so often and I'm now 63 and I've got grinding gut. Makes me sometimes think there's a heaven, and maybe what heaven is all about is you finally make it. You finally grow up. You finally don't have a grinding gut anymore. I'm still working on it. The hope in that, for the young person in here, the hope is it gets easier and easier. It doesn't hurt so much. Doesn't last as long. And I can get through it easier, quicker as I get older. I don't know if that has any relevance for your lives or not. It certainly does for me.
M: Thanks.
M: (NAME), I'm really sad about the way you felt today. I don't know what to say about it. That must be awful for you to hear. I don't know how much I was paying attention to anything today.
F: What you just said means a great deal to me. It tells me that you care about me.
TAPE ENDS
F: I really admire that value for accepting what is, accepting the disappointment that you hoped for isn't going to be the case, recognizing that you dont' want to burden yourself with what ought to be, but more feeling at peace with what is.
M: Mmm hmm.
F: Something else too. That's something I strive for in my life, too.
M: People saying it different ways mean the same thing. (silence) Thanks, (NAME). Sometimes I really _____ you. We both grew up as kids, and we knew our values were pretty close. And I just love how you can express. That's one thing I struggle with, just to find the right word. And I know what I want to say, but it just doesn't come out.
F: From your heart to your mouth sometimes things get lost. You're really clear to me right now.
M: I have been reminded of that.
F: I'm glad you're here, (NAME).
M: Your tone of voice made me think. I think of the first time I couldn't think of a word. I was with (NAME), and I was just trying to be with her when her grandmother was dying. And I remember people coming in and her grandmother would lean forward when she knew somebody came in. She was as sharp as a tack. Right until the very end. And she wanted to know who just came in. But I guess I just like that experience for me, I know she had to die, but it was her turn to do that. But what I experienced these couple of days, I wouldn't trade for community, to see them coming in.
F: This weekend has meant a tremendous amount to you. The story you just told me helps me understand why. It's kind of family here that pulled together. Had a lot of significance for you.
M: Yeah, we really pulled together. And I didn't think it was going to happen. That tension when somebody'd say, "Hey, what's gonig on here?" Somebody have a line. We would have to do something. And that's what it does. And it worked.
F: Powerful commitment of people to each other to engage one another to pull through.
M: Yeah. All we have to do is let our defenses down real quickly. Thanks for inviting me to one of these groups. Thanks for inviting me to it. I kinda knew that I hadn't told you that I felt I really wanted to and I guess this morning I thoug1tfI said, well, it's all right, I'll see you I guess it's a family thing. Maybe it's shifting.
stop here?
F: I heard you say last night or early this morning in the week hours that you would be leaving at 11:00. And you were very clear through the whole weekend about your comitment to M and A, and it makes good sense to me that that comitment could encourage you to leave earlier than the rest of us. Earlier than the end of the scheduled workshop. And I like it when I see you doing what you need, what you want to do, to move where you love, where you receive love and you may give it. And that's my reaction.


M: ...here. I haven't ____ for years. When I had grown up I didn't, I wasn't responsible, I didn't initiate, and I didn't make connections. So now I feel committed to make responsible connections.
F: Are you talking about with (NAME), are you talking about commitments here?
M: About with anybody. When I say I'm going to do something, then this is how far the line moves, it becomes priority. It's really enough to know that I can make my own priorities.
M: Wow. And live them. (silence). Never die. I don't have much time to say good-bye. There's not much time for good-bye. On the drive here I thought, what am I going to leave with? I looked forward to Sunday. When I got here I was on cloud nine. I once felt ____. And it's weird that you would say that about myself, that way. But now I'd better leave. Gonna drive down those same roads to go back home. I got this time, I got. I need to slow down in life. This helps me. 'Cause I hated my prejudiced, cynical, ugly attitude. (NAME) gave me, that's not how you are, but I can tell her it's not me. It's not me, not coming from me.
F: And when you come to a place like this you'll be discovering you have a whole new set of attitudes and priorities. You'll discover you're more whole.
M: It sounds more at peace.
TRANSCRIPTION OF TAPE B16
M: It was extremely difficult. And he didn't want me to assert myself. And the more he didn't want me to assert myself the more i fought against it. And that was what was really what 1 fought against. . because of the loss of control that he had in his life. And it was so painful to just have to push away. Just want to be myself. And I didn't do it in the most adult manner when I left. I didn't know I was leaving. 1 knew I was moving and going somewhere else. He thought I was going to continue the relationship, to me it was obvious that I wasn't going to. And I sort of feel I took ... And I may beating myself up about this, but I sort of feel I took the chicken's way out, without saying I just couldn't do this anymore. I can't let you monopolize my life. I have to be who I am.
F: It troubles you now that you couldn't do it in a pretty way. It sounds as if to you it was an ugly way.
M: I wasn't who I really wanted to be. And I guess part of the pain is that this is someone I prize more than my family is more dear to me than a lot of people in my family. Someone who showed me what the world was about, what life was all about.
F: It's been very hard (NAME) in my life to give credibility to my grief when I'm the one who leaves. I feel I have no right to it. I'm not entitled to it, the loss, because somehow I've created it. It's taken me a long, long time in losses that I've initiated to fmd the space and self-acceptance to mourn that loss.
M: Thank you.  I needed to hear that.  Thank you for hearing me.
M: Thank you very much for sharing that with me. It explained some things I might have been thinking of before. I'm just really glad you shared that with me and with the group. Because I never thought about it. About the way you handled that relationship. It's like the opposite side from me, but, I just thank you.
M: I'm glad I was able to talk about it because I feel more at peace now. And yeah, it was hard for me to mourn that loss because I'd caused it. I just didn't always know that.
F: It's painful for me what happened yesterday. And I found myself really hoping that in some way it might be useful to someone in the community. And I deeply appreciate that that was helpful or it gave something to you.
M: It gave a lot to me. Hopefully now I can be more part of the community again. 'Cause I want to be. And I want to be here and I want to be present. The way you have been for me. The way you have been right now for me.
F: I feel deeply valued by you now, and as a member of the group, that you spoke of your experience, and knew that that was something that you needed to do to rejoin us fully. It indicates to me how deeply you value us and me. I'm very thankful that you spoke just now.
M: Thanks...It means a lot to me.
M: I just got the high sign out there that it's time for lunch.
M: Time for a break?
M: What time do you want to reconvene?
M: Do you want to make it a short break because we won't be together much longer?
F: I would like that.
M: I feel really bad. I feel that I left you guys kinda hanging, because I didn't come in _____ at night. My mental capacity this morning is nil, so I thought it was better if I stayed in bed a little while and get some sleep. (NAME):
M: I'd like to say that I haven't been here. I think I left sometime yesterday. First I thought I was being shut out of the group. And then I realize last night or sometime this morning that I did it myself. I'm not sure why. I feel bad because I wasn't here for people. And I didn't come yesterday afternoon. But I needed to do some things (NAME) that I feel really good about. And that was one of my goals this weekend. So I don't know if it's because I set that goal for myself to deal with (NAME) and that I accomplished everything and left, or if I've been protecting myself because I've felt so much emotion. And I'm not used to doing that, I wasn't raised to do that. And so it was just really scary for me. And so to protect myself, and I feel bad that I did that. It's like I don't know how to respond, and I apologize. I think I've gotten involved in a lot of people's emotions and it kind of shut me down. And I think I'm good at doing that. After this weekend I realize that it's still something I want to work on. It's just really scary. The emotion.
M: I'm glad you were able to say that. Because last evening I was sort of wondering how you were doing. I'm glad to hear from you now.
M: I know and I respect it.
&lt;: I was wondering from (NAME). I heard what you said, and I remember the first night when we met. You talked a little bit. I dont' know if you remember that. It was around the issue of childhood. And it was after (NAME) said something about being a hellraiser. And you talked. And I don't know if it was the time of the night. But you talked about something about your childhood. And people started leaving. No one responded to you. ANd then you got up and left. Some people stayed. I was remembering that. I really felt that you were disregarded. You were abandoned. Not only that but no one brought it up after. And so you left. I want you to know that I noticed that. I ...
M: Thank you. I think I abandon other people, too, because I don't want to feel anything. (long silence) I think I'm shut down. It's okay.
(soft talking)
M: I just want a quick fix - change is for the better. It's going to take a lot of ______  now.
M: I'm not able to feel a lot sometimes. And I've never been in a group like this, where there's so much emotion and support. So I guess I just close myself because it's scary. I'm not used to people who are real and genuine. (long silence) I notice (NAME) has joined us.
M: (NAME), yesterday, I know your need very vividly, when you left. When did you, I felt left. And I just wanted to say that I'm really happy for you that you came back, that you chose to come back. I feel that was a lot for you to do, and I'm happy about that.
F: It seems like such a painful disappointment to you as you realize that there's no quick solution. The thing is that you realized the ingenuineness you've experienced in other places...It seems as if that surprised and disoriented you somehow. I just hope that you can find a space in your heart to accept the experience you had here this weekend and the way...And I trust implicitly that when you choose to do other things this weekend, you wanted to be here, as best you knew how. And I would have had no loss of respect or affection even if your needs had meant you had not been present here at all. And I'm delighted that you could be.
M: ...judging me, it's better to back away, because it doesn't really matter.
